P () the sixteenth letter of the English alphabet, is a nonvocal consonant whose form and value come from the Latin, into which language the letter was brought, through the ancient Greek, from the Phoenician, its probable origin being Egyptian. Etymologically P is most closely related to b, f, and v; as hobble, hopple; father, paternal; recipient, receive. See B, F, and M.

Pa (n.) A shortened form of Papa.

Paage (n.) A toll for passage over another person's grounds.

Paard (n.) The zebra.

Paas (n.) Pace

Paas (n.) The Easter festival.

Pabular (a.) Of, pertaining to, or fit for, pabulum or food; affording food.

Pabulation (n.) The act of feeding, or providing food.

Pabulation (n.) Food; fodder; pabulum.

Pabulous (a.) Affording pabulum, or food; alimental.

Pabulum (n.) The means of nutriment to animals or plants; food; nourishment; hence, that which feeds or sustains, as fuel for a fire; that upon which the mind or soul is nourished; as, intellectual pabulum.

Pac (n.) A kind of moccasin, having the edges of the sole turned up and sewed to the upper.

Paca (n.) A small South American rodent (Coelogenys paca), having blackish brown fur, with four parallel rows of white spots along its sides; the spotted cavy. It is nearly allied to the agouti and the Guinea pig.

Pacable (a.) Placable.

Pacane (n.) A species of hickory. See Pecan.

Pacate (a.) Appeased; pacified; tranquil.

Pacated (a.) Pacified; pacate.

Pacation (n.) The act of pacifying; a peacemaking.

Pace (n.) A single movement from one foot to the other in walking; a step.

Pace (n.) The length of a step in walking or marching, reckoned from the heel of one foot to the heel of the other; -- used as a unit in measuring distances; as, he advanced fifty paces.

Pace (n.) Manner of stepping or moving; gait; walk; as, the walk, trot, canter, gallop, and amble are paces of the horse; a swaggering pace; a quick pace.

Pace (n.) A slow gait; a footpace.

Pace (n.) Specifically, a kind of fast amble; a rack.

Pace (n.) Any single movement, step, or procedure.

Pace (n.) A broad step or platform; any part of a floor slightly raised above the rest, as around an altar, or at the upper end of a hall.

Pace (n.) A device in a loom, to maintain tension on the warp in pacing the web.

Paced (imp. & p. p.) of Pace

Pacing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Pace

Pace (v. i.) To go; to walk; specifically, to move with regular or measured steps.

Pace (v. i.) To proceed; to pass on.

Pace (v. i.) To move quickly by lifting the legs on the same side together, as a horse; to amble with rapidity; to rack.

Pace (v. i.) To pass away; to die.

Pace (v. t.) To walk over with measured tread; to move slowly over or upon; as, the guard paces his round.

Pace (v. t.) To measure by steps or paces; as, to pace a piece of ground.

Pace (v. t.) To develop, guide, or control the pace or paces of; to teach the pace; to break in.

Paced (a.) Having, or trained in, [such] a pace or gait; trained; -- used in composition; as, slow-paced; a thorough-paced villain.

Pacer (n.) One who, or that which, paces; especially, a horse that paces.

Pacha (n.) See Pasha.

Pachacamac (n.) A divinity worshiped by the ancient Peruvians as the creator of the universe.

Pachak (n.) The fragrant roots of the Saussurea Costus, exported from India to China, and used for burning as incense. It is supposed to be the costus of the ancients.

Pachalic (a. & n.) See Pashalic.

Pachisi (n.) Alt. of Parchesi

Parchesi (n.) A game, somewhat resembling backgammon, originating in India.

Pachometer (n.) An instrument for measuring thickness, as of the glass of a mirror, or of paper; a pachymeter.

Pachonta (n.) A substance resembling gutta-percha, and used to adulterate it, obtained from the East Indian tree Isonandra acuminata.

Pachy- () A combining form meaning thick; as, pachyderm, pachydactyl.

Pachycarpous (a.) Having the pericarp thick.

Pachydactyl (n.) A bird or other animal having thick toes.

Pachydactylous (a.) Having thick toes.

Pachyderm (n.) One of the Pachydermata.

Pachydermal (a.) Of or relating to the pachyderms; as, pachydermal dentition.

Pachydermata (n. pl.) A group of hoofed mammals distinguished for the thickness of their skins, including the elephant, hippopotamus, rhinoceros, tapir, horse, and hog. It is now considered an artificial group.

Pachydermatous (a.) Of or pertaining to the pachyderms.

Pachydermatous (a.) Thick-skinned; not sensitive to ridicule.

Pachydermoid (a.) Related to the pachyderms.

Pachyglossal (a.) Having a thick tongue; -- applied to a group of lizards (Pachyglossae), including the iguanas and agamas.

Pachymeningitis (n.) Inflammation of the dura mater or outer membrane of the brain.

Pachymeter (n.) Same as Pachometer.

Pachyote (n.) One of a family of bats, including those which have thick external ears.

Pacifiable (a.) Capable of being pacified or appeased; placable.

Pacific (a.) Of or pertaining to peace; suited to make or restore peace; of a peaceful character; not warlike; not quarrelsome; conciliatory; as, pacific words or acts; a pacific nature or condition.

Pacificable (a.) Placable.

Pacifical (a.) Of or pertaining to peace; pacific.

Pacification (n.) The act or process of pacifying, or of making peace between parties at variance; reconciliation.

Pacificator (n.) One who, or that which, pacifies; a peacemaker.

Pacificatory (a.) Tending to make peace; conciliatory.

Pacfier (n.) One who pacifies.

Pacified (imp. & p. p.) of Pacify

Pacifying (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Pacify

Pacify (v. t.) To make to be at peace; to appease; to calm; to still; to quiet; to allay the agitation, excitement, or resentment of; to tranquillize; as, to pacify a man when angry; to pacify pride, appetite, or importunity.

Pacinian (a.) Of, pertaining to, or discovered by, Filippo Pacini, an Italian physician of the 19th century.

Pack (n.) A pact.

Pack (n.) A bundle made up and prepared to be carried; especially, a bundle to be carried on the back; a load for an animal; a bale, as of goods.

Pack (n.) A number or quantity equal to the contents of a pack; hence, a multitude; a burden.

Pack (n.) A number or quantity of connected or similar things

Pack (n.) A full set of playing cards; also, the assortment used in a particular game; as, a euchre pack.

Pack (n.) A number of hounds or dogs, hunting or kept together.

Pack (n.) A number of persons associated or leagued in a bad design or practice; a gang; as, a pack of thieves or knaves.

Pack (n.) A shook of cask staves.

Pack (n.) A bundle of sheet-iron plates for rolling simultaneously.

Pack (n.) A large area of floating pieces of ice driven together more or less closely.

Pack (n.) An envelope, or wrapping, of sheets used in hydropathic practice, called dry pack, wet pack, cold pack, etc., according to the method of treatment.

Pack (n.) A loose, lewd, or worthless person. See Baggage.

Packed (imp. & p. p.) of Pack

Packing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Pack

Pack (n.) To make a pack of; to arrange closely and securely in a pack; hence, to place and arrange compactly as in a pack; to press into close order or narrow compass; as to pack goods in a box; to pack fish.

Pack (n.) To fill in the manner of a pack, that is, compactly and securely, as for transportation; hence, to fill closely or to repletion; to stow away within; to cause to be full; to crowd into; as, to pack a trunk; the play, or the audience, packs the theater.

Pack (n.) To sort and arrange (the cards) in a pack so as to secure the game unfairly.

Pack (n.) Hence: To bring together or make up unfairly and fraudulently, in order to secure a certain result; as, to pack a jury or a causes.

Pack (n.) To contrive unfairly or fraudulently; to plot.

Pack (n.) To load with a pack; hence, to load; to encumber; as, to pack a horse.

Pack (n.) To cause to go; to send away with baggage or belongings; esp., to send away peremptorily or suddenly; -- sometimes with off; as, to pack a boy off to school.

Pack (n.) To transport in a pack, or in the manner of a pack (i. e., on the backs of men or beasts).

Pack (n.) To envelop in a wet or dry sheet, within numerous coverings. See Pack, n., 5.

Pack (n.) To render impervious, as by filling or surrounding with suitable material, or to fit or adjust so as to move without giving passage to air, water, or steam; as, to pack a joint; to pack the piston of a steam engine.

Pack (v. i.) To make up packs, bales, or bundles; to stow articles securely for transportation.

Pack (v. i.) To admit of stowage, or of making up for transportation or storage; to become compressed or to settle together, so as to form a compact mass; as, the goods pack conveniently; wet snow packs well.

Pack (v. i.) To gather in flocks or schools; as, the grouse or the perch begin to pack.

Pack (v. i.) To depart in haste; -- generally with off or away.

Pack (v. i.) To unite in bad measures; to confederate for ill purposes; to join in collusion.

Package (n.) Act or process of packing.

Package (n.) A bundle made up for transportation; a packet; a bale; a parcel; as, a package of goods.

Package (n.) A charge made for packing goods.

Package (n.) A duty formerly charged in the port of London on goods imported or exported by aliens, or by denizens who were the sons of aliens.

Packer (n.) A person whose business is to pack things; especially, one who packs food for preservation; as, a pork packer.

Packet (n.) A small pack or package; a little bundle or parcel; as, a packet of letters.

Packet (n.) Originally, a vessel employed by government to convey dispatches or mails; hence, a vessel employed in conveying dispatches, mails, passengers, and goods, and having fixed days of sailing; a mail boat.

Packeted (imp. & p. p.) of Packet

Packeting (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Packet

Packet (v. t.) To make up into a packet or bundle.

Packet (v. t.) To send in a packet or dispatch vessel.

Packet (v. i.) To ply with a packet or dispatch boat.

Packfong (n.) A Chinese alloy of nickel, zinc, and copper, resembling German silver.

Pack herse () See under 2d Pack.

Packhouse (n.) Warehouse for storing goods.

Packing (n.) The act or process of one who packs.

Packing (n.) Any material used to pack, fill up, or make close.

Packing (n.) A substance or piece used to make a joint impervious

Packing (n.) A thin layer, or sheet, of yielding or elastic material inserted between the surfaces of a flange joint.

Packing (n.) The substance in a stuffing box, through which a piston rod slides.

Packing (n.) A yielding ring, as of metal, which surrounds a piston and maintains a tight fit, as inside a cylinder, etc.

Packing (n.) Same as Filling.

Packing (n.) A trick; collusion.

Packmen (pl. ) of Packman

Packman (n.) One who bears a pack; a peddler.

Pack saddle () Alt. of Pack thread

Pack thread () See under 2d Pack.

Packwax (n.) Same as Paxwax.

Packway (n.) A path, as over mountains, followed by pack animals.

Paco (n.) Alt. of Pacos

Pacos (n.) Same as Alpaca.

Pacos (n.) An earthy-looking ore, consisting of brown oxide of iron with minute particles of native silver.

Pact (v.) An agreement; a league; a compact; a covenant.

Paction (n.) An agreement; a compact; a bargain.

Pactional (a.) Of the nature of, or by means of, a paction.

Pactitious (a.) Setted by a pact, or agreement.

Pactolian (a.) Pertaining to the Pactolus, a river in ancient Lydia famous for its golden sands.

Pacu (n.) A South American freah-water fish (Myleies pacu), of the family Characinidae. It is highly esteemed as food.

Pad (n.) A footpath; a road.

Pad (n.) An easy-paced horse; a padnag.

Pad (n.) A robber that infests the road on foot; a highwayman; -- usually called a footpad.

Pad (n.) The act of robbing on the highway.

Pad (v. t.) To travel upon foot; to tread.

Pad (v. i.) To travel heavily or slowly.

Pad (v. i.) To rob on foot.

Pad (v. i.) To wear a path by walking.

Pad (n.) A soft, or small, cushion; a mass of anything soft; stuffing.

Pad (n.) A kind of cushion for writing upon, or for blotting; esp., one formed of many flat sheets of writing paper, or layers of blotting paper; a block of paper.

Pad (n.) A cushion used as a saddle without a tree or frame.

Pad (n.) A stuffed guard or protection; esp., one worn on the legs of horses to prevent bruising.

Pad (n.) A cushionlike thickening of the skin one the under side of the toes of animals.

Pad (n.) A floating leaf of a water lily or similar plant.

Pad (n.) A soft bag or cushion to relieve pressure, support a part, etc.

Pad (n.) A piece of timber fixed on a beam to fit the curve of the deck.

Pad (n.) A measure for fish; as, sixty mackerel go to a pad; a basket of soles.

Padded (imp. & p. p.) of Pad

Padding (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Pad

Pad (v. t.) To stuff; to furnish with a pad or padding.

Pad (v. t.) To imbue uniformly with a mordant; as, to pad cloth.

Padar (n.) Groats; coarse flour or meal.

Padder (n.) One who, or that which, pads.

Padder (n.) A highwayman; a footpad.

Padding (n.) The act or process of making a pad or of inserting stuffing.

Padding (n.) The material with which anything is padded.

Padding (n.) Material of inferior value, serving to extend a book, essay, etc.

Padding (n.) The uniform impregnation of cloth with a mordant.

Paddle (v. i.) To use the hands or fingers in toying; to make caressing strokes.

Paddle (v. i.) To dabble in water with hands or feet; to use a paddle, or something which serves as a paddle, in swimming, in paddling a boat, etc.

Paddled (imp. & p. p.) of Paddle

Paddling (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Paddle

Paddle (v. t.) To pat or stroke amorously, or gently.

Paddle (v. t.) To propel with, or as with, a paddle or paddles.

Paddle (v. t.) To pad; to tread upon; to trample.

Paddle (v. i.) An implement with a broad blade, which is used without a fixed fulcrum in propelling and steering canoes and boats.

Paddle (v. i.) The broad part of a paddle, with which the stroke is made; hence, any short, broad blade, resembling that of a paddle.

Paddle (v. i.) One of the broad boards, or floats, at the circumference of a water wheel, or paddle wheel.

Paddle (v. i.) A small gate in sluices or lock gates to admit or let off water; -- also called clough.

Paddle (v. i.) A paddle-shaped foot, as of the sea turtle.

Paddle (v. i.) A paddle-shaped implement for string or mixing.

Paddle (v. i.) See Paddle staff (b), below.

Paddlecock (n.) The lumpfish.

Paddlefish (n.) A large ganoid fish (Polyodon spathula) found in the rivers of the Mississippi Valley. It has a long spatula-shaped snout. Called also duck-billed cat, and spoonbill sturgeon.

Padder (n.) One who, or that which, paddles.

Paddlewood (n.) The light elastic wood of the Aspidosperma excelsum, a tree of Guiana having a fluted trunk readily split into planks.

Paddock (n.) A toad or frog.

Paddock (n.) A small inclosure or park for sporting.

Paddock (n.) A small inclosure for pasture; esp., one adjoining a stable.

Paddy (a.) Low; mean; boorish; vagabond.

Paddies (pl. ) of Paddy

Paddy (n.) A jocose or contemptuous name for an Irishman.

Paddy (n.) Unhusked rice; -- commonly so called in the East Indies.

Padelion (n.) A plant with pedately lobed leaves; the lady's mantle.

Padella (n.) A large cup or deep saucer, containing fatty matter in which a wick is placed, -- used for public illuminations, as at St. Peter's, in Rome. Called also padelle.

Pademelon (n.) See Wallaby.

Padesoy (n.) See Paduasoy.

Padge (n.) The barn owl; -- called also pudge, and pudge owl.

Padishah (n.) Chief ruler; monarch; sovereign; -- a title of the Sultan of Turkey, and of the Shah of Persia.

Padlock (n.) A portable lock with a bow which is usually jointed or pivoted at one end so that it can be opened, the other end being fastened by the bolt, -- used for fastening by passing the bow through a staple over a hasp or through the links of a chain, etc.

Padlock (n.) Fig.: A curb; a restraint.

Padlocked (imp. & p. p.) of Padlock

Padlocking (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Padlock

Padlock (v. t.) To fasten with, or as with, a padlock; to stop; to shut; to confine as by a padlock.

Padnag (n.) An ambling nag.

Padow (n.) A paddock, or toad.

Padroni (pl. ) of Padrone

Padrones (pl. ) of Padrone

Padrone (n.) A patron; a protector.

Padrone (n.) The master of a small coaster in the Mediterranean.

Padrone (n.) A man who imports, and controls the earnings of, Italian laborers, street musicians, etc.

Paduasoy (n.) A rich and heavy silk stuff.

Paducahs (n. pl.) See Comanches.

Paean (n.) An ancient Greek hymn in honor of Apollo as a healing deity, and, later, a song addressed to other deities.

Paean (n.) Any loud and joyous song; a song of triumph.

Paean (n.) See Paeon.

Paedobaptism (n.) Pedobaptism.

Paedogenesis (n.) Reproduction by young or larval animals.

Paedogenetic (a.) Producing young while in the immature or larval state; -- said of certain insects, etc.

Paeon (n.) A foot of four syllables, one long and three short, admitting of four combinations, according to the place of the long syllable.

Paeonine (n.) An artifical red nitrogenous dyestuff, called also red coralline.

Paeony (n.) See Peony.

Pagan (n.) One who worships false gods; an idolater; a heathen; one who is neither a Christian, a Mohammedan, nor a Jew.

Pagan (n.) Of or pertaining to pagans; relating to the worship or the worshipers of false goods; heathen; idolatrous, as, pagan tribes or superstitions.

Pagandom (n.) The pagan lands; pagans, collectively; paganism.

Paganic (a.) Alt. of Paganical

Paganical (a.) Of or pertaining to pagans or paganism; heathenish; paganish.

Paganish (a.) Of or pertaining to pagans; heathenish.

Paganism (n.) The state of being pagan; pagan characteristics; esp., the worship of idols or false gods, or the system of religious opinions and worship maintained by pagans; heathenism.

Paganity (n.) The state of being a pagan; paganism.

Paganized (imp. & p. p.) of Paganize

Paganizing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Paganize

Paganize (v. t.) To render pagan or heathenish; to convert to paganism.

Paganize (v. i.) To behave like pagans.

Paganly (adv.) In a pagan manner.

Page (n.) A serving boy; formerly, a youth attending a person of high degree, especially at courts, as a position of honor and education; now commonly, in England, a youth employed for doing errands, waiting on the door, and similar service in households; in the United States, a boy employed to wait upon the members of a legislative body.

Page (n.) A boy child.

Page (n.) A contrivance, as a band, pin, snap, or the like, to hold the skirt of a woman's dress from the ground.

Page (n.) A track along which pallets carrying newly molded bricks are conveyed to the hack.

Page (n.) Any one of several species of beautiful South American moths of the genus Urania.

Page (v. t.) To attend (one) as a page.

Page (n.) One side of a leaf of a book or manuscript.

Page (n.) Fig.: A record; a writing; as, the page of history.

Page (n.) The type set up for printing a page.

Paged (imp. & p. p.) of Page

Paging (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Page

Page (v. t.) To mark or number the pages of, as a book or manuscript; to furnish with folios.

Pageant (n.) A theatrical exhibition; a spectacle.

Pageant (n.) An elaborate exhibition devised for the entertainmeut of a distinguished personage, or of the public; a show, spectacle, or display.

Pageant (a.) Of the nature of a pageant; spectacular.

Pageant (v. t.) To exhibit in show; to represent; to mimic.

Pageantry (n.) Scenic shows or spectacles, taken collectively; spectacular quality; splendor.

Pagehood (n.) The state of being a page.

Paginae (pl. ) of Pagina

Pagina (n.) The surface of a leaf or of a flattened thallus.

Paginal (a.) Consisting of pages.

Pagination (n.) The act or process of paging a book; also, the characters used in numbering the pages; page number.

Paging (n.) The marking or numbering of the pages of a book.

Pagod (n.) A pagoda. [R.] "Or some queer pagod."

Pagod (n.) An idol.

Pagoda (n.) A term by which Europeans designate religious temples and tower-like buildings of the Hindoos and Buddhists of India, Farther India, China, and Japan, -- usually but not always, devoted to idol worship.

Pagoda (n.) An idol.

Pagoda (n.) A gold or silver coin, of various kinds and values, formerly current in India. The Madras gold pagoda was worth about three and a half rupees.

Pagodite (n.) Agalmatolite; -- so called because sometimes carved by the Chinese into the form of pagodas. See Agalmatolite.

Paguma (n.) Any one of several species of East Indian viverrine mammals of the genus Paguma. They resemble a weasel in form.

Pagurian (n.) Any one of a tribe of anomuran crustaceans, of which Pagurus is a type; the hermit crab. See Hermit crab, under Hermit.

Pah (interj.) An exclamation expressing disgust or contempt. See Bah.

Pah (n.) A kind of stockaded intrenchment.

Pahi (n.) A large war canoe of the Society Islands.

Pahlevi (n.) Same as Pehlevi.

Pahoehoe (n.) A name given in the Sandwich Islands to lava having a relatively smooth surface, in distinction from the rough-surfaced lava, called a-a.

PahUtes (n. pl.) See Utes.

Paid (imp., p. p., & a.) Receiving pay; compensated; hired; as, a paid attorney.

Paid (imp., p. p., & a.) Satisfied; contented.

Paideutics (n.) The science or art of teaching.

Paien (n. & a.) Pagan.

Paigle (n.) A species of Primula, either the cowslip or the primrose.

Paijama (n.) Pyjama.

Pail (n.) A vessel of wood or tin, etc., usually cylindrical and having a bail, -- used esp. for carrying liquids, as water or milk, etc.; a bucket. It may, or may not, have a cover.

Pailfuls (pl. ) of Pailful

Pailful (n.) The quantity that a pail will hold.

Paillasse (n.) An under bed or mattress of straw.

Pailmall (n. & a.) See Pall-mall.

Pain (n.) Punishment suffered or denounced; suffering or evil inflicted as a punishment for crime, or connected with the commission of a crime; penalty.

Pain (n.) Any uneasy sensation in animal bodies, from slight uneasiness to extreme distress or torture, proceeding from a derangement of functions, disease, or injury by violence; bodily distress; bodily suffering; an ache; a smart.

Pain (n.) Specifically, the throes or travail of childbirth.

Pain (n.) Uneasiness of mind; mental distress; disquietude; anxiety; grief; solicitude; anguish.

Pain (n.) See Pains, labor, effort.

Pained (imp. & p. p.) of Pain

Paining (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Pain

Pain (n.) To inflict suffering upon as a penalty; to punish.

Pain (n.) To put to bodily uneasiness or anguish; to afflict with uneasy sensations of any degree of intensity; to torment; to torture; as, his dinner or his wound pained him; his stomach pained him.

Pain (n.) To render uneasy in mind; to disquiet; to distress; to grieve; as a child's faults pain his parents.

Painable (a.) Causing pain; painful.

Painful (a.) Full of pain; causing uneasiness or distress, either physical or mental; afflictive; disquieting; distressing.

Painful (a.) Requiring labor or toil; difficult; executed with laborious effort; as a painful service; a painful march.

Painful (a.) Painstaking; careful; industrious.

Painim (n.) A pagan; an infidel; -- used also adjectively.

Painless (a.) Free from pain; without pain.

Pains (n.) Labor; toilsome effort; care or trouble taken; -- plural in form, but used with a singular or plural verb, commonly the former.

Painstaker (n.) One who takes pains; one careful and faithful in all work.

Painstaking (a.) Careful in doing; diligent; faithful; attentive.

Painstaking (n.) The act of taking pains; carefulness and fidelity in performance.

Painsworthy (a.) Worth the pains or care bestowed.

Painted (imp. & p. p.) of Paint

Painting (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Paint

Paint (v. t.) To cover with coloring matter; to apply paint to; as, to paint a house, a signboard, etc.

Paint (v. t.) Fig.: To color, stain, or tinge; to adorn or beautify with colors; to diversify with colors.

Paint (v. t.) To form in colors a figure or likeness of on a flat surface, as upon canvas; to represent by means of colors or hues; to exhibit in a tinted image; to portray with paints; as, to paint a portrait or a landscape.

Paint (v. t.) Fig.: To represent or exhibit to the mind; to describe vividly; to delineate; to image; to depict.

Paint (v. t.) To practice the art of painting; as, the artist paints well.

Paint (v. t.) To color one's face by way of beautifying it.

Paint (n.) A pigment or coloring substance.

Paint (n.) The same prepared with a vehicle, as oil, water with gum, or the like, for application to a surface.

Paint (n.) A cosmetic; rouge.

Painted (a.) Covered or adorned with paint; portrayed in colors.

Painted (a.) Marked with bright colors; as, the painted turtle; painted bunting.

Painter (n.) A rope at the bow of a boat, used to fasten it to anything.

Painter (n.) The panther, or puma.

Painter (n.) One whose occupation is to paint

Painter (n.) One who covers buildings, ships, ironwork, and the like, with paint.

Painter (n.) An artist who represents objects or scenes in color on a flat surface, as canvas, plaster, or the like.

Painterly (a.) Like a painter's work.

Paintership (n.) The state or position of being a painter.

Painting (n.) The act or employment of laying on, or adorning with, paints or colors.

Painting (n.) The work of the painter; also, any work of art in which objects are represented in color on a flat surface; a colored representation of any object or scene; a picture.

Painting (n.) Color laid on; paint.

Painting (n.) A depicting by words; vivid representation in words.

Paintless (a.) Not capable of being painted or described.

Painture (v. t.) The art of painting.

Painty (a.) Unskillfully painted, so that the painter's method of work is too obvious; also, having too much pigment applied to the surface.

Pair (n.) A number of things resembling one another, or belonging together; a set; as, a pair or flight of stairs. "A pair of beads." Chaucer. Beau. & Fl. "Four pair of stairs." Macaulay. [Now mostly or quite disused, except as to stairs.]

Pair (n.) Two things of a kind, similar in form, suited to each other, and intended to be used together; as, a pair of gloves or stockings; a pair of shoes.

Pair (n.) Two of a sort; a span; a yoke; a couple; a brace; as, a pair of horses; a pair of oxen.

Pair (n.) A married couple; a man and wife.

Pair (n.) A single thing, composed of two pieces fitted to each other and used together; as, a pair of scissors; a pair of tongs; a pair of bellows.

Pair (n.) Two members of opposite parties or opinion, as in a parliamentary body, who mutually agree not to vote on a given question, or on issues of a party nature during a specified time; as, there were two pairs on the final vote.

Pair (n.) In a mechanism, two elements, or bodies, which are so applied to each other as to mutually constrain relative motion.

Pairs Royal (pl. ) of Pair

Paired (imp. & p. p.) of Pair

Pairing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Pair

Pair (v. i.) To be joined in paris; to couple; to mate, as for breeding.

Pair (v. i.) To suit; to fit, as a counterpart.

Pair (v. i.) Same as To pair off. See phrase below.

Pair (v. t.) To unite in couples; to form a pair of; to bring together, as things which belong together, or which complement, or are adapted to one another.

Pair (v. t.) To engage (one's self) with another of opposite opinions not to vote on a particular question or class of questions.

Pair (v. t.) To impair.

Pairer (n.) One who impairs.

Pairing (v. i.) The act or process of uniting or arranging in pairs or couples.

Pairing (v. i.) See To pair off, under Pair, v. i.

Pairment (n.) Impairment.

Pais (n.) The country; the people of the neighborhood.

Paisano (n.) The chaparral cock.

Paise (n.) See Poise.

Pajock (n.) A peacock.

Pakfong (n.) See Packfong.

Pal (n.) A mate; a partner; esp., an accomplice or confederate.

Palace (n.) The residence of a sovereign, including the lodgings of high officers of state, and rooms for business, as well as halls for ceremony and reception.

Palace (n.) The official residence of a bishop or other distinguished personage.

Palace (n.) Loosely, any unusually magnificent or stately house.

Palacious (a.) Palatial.

Paladin (n.) A knight-errant; a distinguished champion; as, the paladins of Charlemagne.

Palaeo- () See Paleo-.

Palaeographer (a.) Alt. of Palaeographic

Palaeographic (a.) See Paleographer, Paleographic, etc.

Palaeotype (n.) A system of representing all spoken sounds by means of the printing types in common use.

Palaestra (n.) See Palestra.

Palaestric (a.) See Palestric.

Palaetiologist (n.) One versed in palaetiology.

Palaetiology (n.) The science which explains, by the law of causation, the past condition and changes of the earth.

Palamme (pl. ) of Palama

Palama (n.) A membrane extending between the toes of a bird, and uniting them more or less closely together.

Palamedeae (n. pl.) An order, or suborder, including the kamichi, and allied South American birds; -- called also screamers. In many anatomical characters they are allied to the Anseres, but they externally resemble the wading birds.

Palampore (n.) See Palempore.

Palanka (n.) A camp permanently intrenched, attached to Turkish frontier fortresses.

Palanquin (n.) An inclosed carriage or litter, commonly about eight feet long, four feet wide, and four feet high, borne on the shoulders of men by means of two projecting poles, -- used in India, China, etc., for the conveyance of a single person from place to place.

Palapteryx (n.) A large extinct ostrichlike bird of New Zealand.

Palatability (n.) Palatableness.

Palatable (a.) Agreeable to the palate or taste; savory; hence, acceptable; pleasing; as, palatable food; palatable advice.

Palatableness (n.) The quality or state of being agreeable to the taste; relish; acceptableness.

Palatably (adv.) In a palatable manner.

Palatal (a.) Of or pertaining to the palate; palatine; as, the palatal bones.

Palatal (a.) Uttered by the aid of the palate; -- said of certain sounds, as the sound of k in kirk.

Palatal (n.) A sound uttered, or a letter pronounced, by the aid of the palate, as the letters k and y.

Palatalize (v. t.) To palatize.

Palate (n.) The roof of the mouth.

Palate (n.) Relish; taste; liking; -- a sense originating in the mistaken notion that the palate is the organ of taste.

Palate (n.) Fig.: Mental relish; intellectual taste.

Palate (n.) A projection in the throat of such flowers as the snapdragon.

Palate (v. t.) To perceive by the taste.

Palatial (a.) Of or pertaining to a palace; suitable for a palace; resembling a palace; royal; magnificent; as, palatial structures.

Palatial (a.) Palatal; palatine.

Palatial (n.) A palatal letter.

Palatic (a.) Palatal; palatine.

Palatic (n.) A palatal.

Palatinate (n.) The province or seigniory of a palatine; the dignity of a palatine.

Palatinate (v. t.) To make a palatinate of.

Palatine (a.) Of or pertaining to a palace, or to a high officer of a palace; hence, possessing royal privileges.

Palatine (n.) One invested with royal privileges and rights within his domains; a count palatine. See Count palatine, under 4th Count.

Palatine (n.) The Palatine hill in Rome.

Palatine (a.) Of or pertaining to the palate.

Palatine (n.) A palatine bone.

Palative (a.) Pleasing to the taste; palatable.

Palatize (v. t.) To modify, as the tones of the voice, by means of the palate; as, to palatize a letter or sound.

Palato- () A combining form used in anatomy to indicate relation to, or connection with, the palate; as in palatolingual.

Palatonares (n. pl.) The posterior nares. See Nares.

Palatopterygoid (a.) Pertaining to the palatine and pterygoid region of the skull; as, the palatopterygoid cartilage, or rod, from which the palatine and pterygoid bones are developed.

Palaver (n.) Talk; conversation; esp., idle or beguiling talk; talk intended to deceive; flattery.

Palaver (n.) In Africa, a parley with the natives; a talk; hence, a public conference and deliberation; a debate.

Palavered (imp. & p. p.) of Palaver

Palavering (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Palaver

Palaver (v. t. & i.) To make palaver with, or to; to used palaver;to talk idly or deceitfully; to employ flattery; to cajole; as, to palaver artfully.

Palaverer (n.) One who palavers; a flatterer.

Pale (v. i.) Wanting in color; not ruddy; dusky white; pallid; wan; as, a pale face; a pale red; a pale blue.

Pale (v. i.) Not bright or brilliant; of a faint luster or hue; dim; as, the pale light of the moon.

Pale (n.) Paleness; pallor.

Paled (imp. & p. p.) of Pale

Paling (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Pale

Pale (v. i.) To turn pale; to lose color or luster.

Pale (v. t.) To make pale; to diminish the brightness of.

Pale (n.) A pointed stake or slat, either driven into the ground, or fastened to a rail at the top and bottom, for fencing or inclosing; a picket.

Pale (n.) That which incloses or fences in; a boundary; a limit; a fence; a palisade.

Pale (n.) A space or field having bounds or limits; a limited region or place; an inclosure; -- often used figuratively.

Pale (n.) A stripe or band, as on a garment.

Pale (n.) One of the greater ordinaries, being a broad perpendicular stripe in an escutcheon, equally distant from the two edges, and occupying one third of it.

Pale (n.) A cheese scoop.

Pale (n.) A shore for bracing a timber before it is fastened.

Pale (v. t.) To inclose with pales, or as with pales; to encircle; to encompass; to fence off.

Paleae (pl. ) of Palea

Palea (n.) The interior chaff or husk of grasses.

Palea (n.) One of the chaffy scales or bractlets growing on the receptacle of many compound flowers, as the Coreopsis, the sunflower, etc.

Palea (n.) A pendulous process of the skin on the throat of a bird, as in the turkey; a dewlap.

Paleaceous (a.) Chaffy; resembling or consisting of paleae, or chaff; furnished with chaff; as, a paleaceous receptacle.

Palearctic (a.) Belonging to a region of the earth's surface which includes all Europe to the Azores, Iceland, and all temperate Asia.

Paled (a.) Striped.

Paled (a.) Inclosed with a paling.

Paleechinoidea (n. pl.) An extinct order of sea urchins found in the Paleozoic rocks. They had more than twenty vertical rows of plates. Called also Palaeechini.

Paleface (n.) A white person; -- an appellation supposed to have been applied to the whites by the American Indians.

Paleichthyes (n. pl.) A comprehensive division of fishes which includes the elasmobranchs and ganoids.

Palely (a.) In a pale manner; dimly; wanly; not freshly or ruddily.

Palempore (n.) A superior kind of dimity made in India, -- used for bed coverings.

Paleness (n.) The quality or condition of being pale; want of freshness or ruddiness; a sickly whiteness; lack of color or luster; wanness.

Palenque (n. pl.) A collective name for the Indians of Nicaragua and Honduras.

Paleo- () A combining form meaning old, ancient; as, palearctic, paleontology, paleothere, paleography.

Paleobotanist (n.) One versed in paleobotany.

Paleobotany (n.) That branch of paleontology which treats of fossil plants.

Paleocarida (n. pl.) Same as Merostomata.

Paleocrinoidea (n. pl.) A suborder of Crinoidea found chiefly in the Paleozoic rocks.

Paleocrystic (a.) Of, pertaining to, or derived from, a former glacial formation.

Paleogaean (a.) Of or pertaining to the Eastern hemisphere.

Paleograph (n.) An ancient manuscript.

Paleographer (n.) One skilled in paleography; a paleographist.

Paleographic (a.) Alt. of Paleographical

Paleographical (a.) Of or pertaining to paleography.

Paleographist (n.) One versed in paleography; a paleographer.

Paleography (n.) An ancient manner of writing; ancient writings, collectively; as, Punic paleography.

Paleography (n.) The study of ancient inscriptions and modes of writing; the art or science of deciphering ancient writings, and determining their origin, period, etc., from external characters; diplomatics.

Paleolae (pl. ) of Paleola

Paleola (n.) A diminutive or secondary palea; a lodicule.

Paleolith (n.) A relic of the Paleolithic era.

Paleolithic (a.) Of or pertaining to an era marked by early stone implements. The Paleolithic era (as proposed by Lubbock) includes the earlier half of the "Stone Age;" the remains belonging to it are for the most part of extinct animals, with relics of human beings.

Paleologist (n.) One versed in paleology; a student of antiquity.

Paleology (n.) The study or knowledge of antiquities, esp. of prehistoric antiquities; a discourse or treatise on antiquities; archaeology .

Paleontographical (a.) Of or pertaining to the description of fossil remains.

Paleontography (n.) The description of fossil remains.

Paleontological (a.) Of or pertaining to paleontology.

Paleontologist (n.) One versed in paleontology.

Paleontology (n.) The science which treats of the ancient life of the earth, or of fossils which are the remains of such life.

Paleophytologist (n.) A paleobotanist.

Paleophytology (n.) Paleobotany.

Paleornithology (n.) The branch of paleontology which treats of fossil birds.

Paleosaurus (n.) A genus of fossil saurians found in the Permian formation.

Paleotechnic (a.) Belonging to, or connected with, ancient art.

Paleothere (n.) Any species of Paleotherium.

Paleotherian (a.) Of or pertaining to Paleotherium.

Paleotherium (n.) An extinct genus of herbivorous Tertiary mammals, once supposed to have resembled the tapir in form, but now known to have had a more slender form, with a long neck like that of a llama.

Paleotheroid () Resembling Paleotherium.

Paleotheroid (n.) An animal resembling, or allied to, the paleothere.

Paleotype (n.) See Palaeotype.

Paleous (a.) Chaffy; like chaff; paleaceous.

Paleozoic (a.) Of or pertaining to, or designating, the older division of geological time during which life is known to have existed, including the Silurian, Devonian, and Carboniferous ages, and also to the life or rocks of those ages. See Chart of Geology.

Paleozoology (n.) The Paleozoic time or strata.

Paleozooogy (n.) The science of extinct animals, a branch of paleontology.

Palesie (n.) Alt. of Palesy

Palesy (n.) Palsy.

Palestinian (a.) Alt. of Palestinean

Palestinean (a.) Of or pertaining to Palestine.

Palestrae (pl. ) of Palestra

Palestras (pl. ) of Palestra

Palestra (n.) A wrestling school; hence, a gymnasium, or place for athletic exercise in general.

Palestra (n.) A wrestling; the exercise of wrestling.

Palestrian (a.) Alt. of Palestrical

Palestric (a.) Alt. of Palestrical

Palestrical (a.) Of or pertaining to the palestra, or to wrestling.

Palet (n.) Same as Palea.

Paletot (n.) An overcoat.

Paletot (n.) A lady's outer garment, -- of varying fashion.

Palette (n.) A thin, oval or square board, or tablet, with a thumb hole at one end for holding it, on which a painter lays and mixes his pigments.

Palette (n.) One of the plates covering the points of junction at the bend of the shoulders and elbows.

Palette (n.) A breastplate for a breast drill.

Palewise (adv.) In the manner of a pale or pales; by perpendicular lines or divisions; as, to divide an escutcheon palewise.

Palfrey (n.) A saddle horse for the road, or for state occasions, as distinguished from a war horse.

Palfrey (n.) A small saddle horse for ladies.

Palfreyed (a.) Mounted on a palfrey.

Palgrave (n.) See Palsgrave.

Pali (n.) pl. of Palus.

Pali (n.) A dialect descended from Sanskrit, and like that, a dead language, except when used as the sacred language of the Buddhist religion in Farther India, etc.

Palification (n.) The act or practice of driving piles or posts into the ground to make it firm.

Paliform (a.) Resembling a palus; as, the paliform lobes of the septa in corals.

Palilogy (n.) The repetition of a word, or part of a sentence, for the sake of greater emphasis; as, "The living, the living, he shall praise thee."

Palimpsest (n.) A parchment which has been written upon twice, the first writing having been erased to make place for the second.

Palindrome (n.) A word, verse, or sentence, that is the same when read backward or forward; as, madam; Hannah; or Lewd did I live, & evil I did dwel.

Palindromic (a.) Alt. of Palindromical

Palindromical (a.) Of, pertaining to, or like, a palindrome.

Palindromist (n.) A writer of palindromes.

Paling (n.) Pales, in general; a fence formed with pales or pickets; a limit; an inclosure.

Paling (n.) The act of placing pales or stripes on cloth; also, the stripes themselves.

Palingenesia (n.) See Palingenesis.

Palingenesis (n.) Alt. of Palingenesy

Palingenesy (n.) A new birth; a re-creation; a regeneration; a continued existence in different manner or form.

Palingenesy (n.) That form of evolution in which the truly ancestral characters conserved by heredity are reproduced in development; original simple descent; -- distinguished from kenogenesis. Sometimes, in zoology, the abrupt metamorphosis of insects, crustaceans, etc.

Palingenetic (a.) Of or pertaining to palingenesis: as, a palingenetic process.

Palinode (n.) An ode recanting, or retracting, a former one; also, a repetition of an ode.

Palinode (n.) A retraction; esp., a formal retraction.

Palinodial (a.) Of or pertaining to a palinode, or retraction.

Palinody (n.) See Palinode.

Palinurus (n.) An instrument for obtaining directly, without calculation, the true bearing of the sun, and thence the variation of the compass

Palisade (n.) A strong, long stake, one end of which is set firmly in the ground, and the other is sharpened; also, a fence formed of such stakes set in the ground as a means of defense.

Palisade (n.) Any fence made of pales or sharp stakes.

Palisaded (imp. & p. p.) of Palisade

Palisading (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Palisade

Palisade (v. t.) To surround, inclose, or fortify, with palisades.

Palisading (n.) A row of palisades set in the ground.

Palisadoes (pl. ) of Palisado

Palisado (n.) A palisade.

Palisado (v. t.) To palisade.

Palish (a.) Somewhat pale or wan.

Palissander (n.) Violet wood.

Palissander (n.) Rosewood.

Palissy (a.) Designating, or of the nature of, a kind of pottery made by Bernard Palissy, in France, in the 16th centry.

Palkee (n.) A palanquin.

Pall (n.) Same as Pawl.

Pall (n.) An outer garment; a cloak mantle.

Pall (n.) A kind of rich stuff used for garments in the Middle Ages.

Pall (n.) Same as Pallium.

Pall (n.) A figure resembling the Roman Catholic pallium, or pall, and having the form of the letter Y.

Pall (n.) A large cloth, esp., a heavy black cloth, thrown over a coffin at a funeral; sometimes, also, over a tomb.

Pall (n.) A piece of cardboard, covered with linen and embroidered on one side; -- used to put over the chalice.

Pall (v. t.) To cloak.

Palled (imp. & p. p.) of Pall

Palling (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Pall

Pall (a.) To become vapid, tasteless, dull, or insipid; to lose strength, life, spirit, or taste; as, the liquor palls.

Pall (v. t.) To make vapid or insipid; to make lifeless or spiritless; to dull; to weaken.

Pall (v. t.) To satiate; to cloy; as, to pall the appetite.

Pall (n.) Nausea.

Palla (n.) An oblong rectangular piece of cloth, worn by Roman ladies, and fastened with brooches.

Palladian (a.) Of, pertaining to, or designating, a variety of the revived classic style of architecture, founded on the works of Andrea Palladio, an Italian architect of the 16th century.

Palladic (a.) Of, pertaining to, or derived from, palladium; -- used specifically to designate those compounds in which the element has a higher valence as contrasted with palladious compounds.

Palladious (a.) Of, pertaining to, or containing, palladium; -- used specifically to designate those compounds in which palladium has a lower valence as compared with palladic compounds.

Palladium (n.) Any statue of the goddess Pallas; esp., the famous statue on the preservation of which depended the safety of ancient Troy.

Palladium (n.) Hence: That which affords effectual protection or security; a sateguard; as, the trial by jury is the palladium of our civil rights.

Palladium (n.) A rare metallic element of the light platinum group, found native, and also alloyed with platinum and gold. It is a silver-white metal resembling platinum, and like it permanent and untarnished in the air, but is more easily fusible. It is unique in its power of occluding hydrogen, which it does to the extent of nearly a thousand volumes, forming the alloy Pd2H. It is used for graduated circles and verniers, for plating certain silver goods, and somewhat in dentistry. It was so named in 1804 by Wollaston from the asteroid Pallas, which was discovered in 1802. Symbol Pd. Atomic weight, 106.2.

Palladiumized (imp. & p. p.) of Paladiumize

Palladiumizing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Paladiumize

Paladiumize (v. t.) To cover or coat with palladium.

Pallah (n.) A large South African antelope (Aepyceros melampus). The male has long lyrate and annulated horns. The general color is bay, with a black crescent on the croup. Called also roodebok.

Pallas (n.) Pallas Athene, the Grecian goddess of wisdom, called also Athene, and identified, at a later period, with the Roman Minerva.

Pallbearer (n.) One of those who attend the coffin at a funeral; -- so called from the pall being formerly carried by them.

Pallet (n.) A small and mean bed; a bed of straw.

Palet (n.) A perpendicular band upon an escutcheon, one half the breadth of the pale.

Pallet (n.) Same as Palette.

Pallet (n.) A wooden implement used by potters, crucible makers, etc., for forming, beating, and rounding their works. It is oval, round, and of other forms.

Pallet (n.) A potter's wheel.

Pallet (n.) An instrument used to take up gold leaf from the pillow, and to apply it.

Pallet (n.) A tool for gilding the backs of books over the bands.

Pallet (n.) A board on which a newly molded brick is conveyed to the hack.

Pallet (n.) A click or pawl for driving a ratchet wheel.

Pallet (n.) One of the series of disks or pistons in the chain pump.

Pallet (n.) One of the pieces or levers connected with the pendulum of a clock, or the balance of a watch, which receive the immediate impulse of the scape-wheel, or balance wheel.

Pallet (n.) In the organ, a valve between the wind chest and the mouth of a pipe or row of pipes.

Pallet (n.) One of a pair of shelly plates that protect the siphon tubes of certain bivalves, as the Teredo. See Illust. of Teredo.

Pallet (n.) A cup containing three ounces, -- /ormerly used by surgeons.

Pallial (a.) Of or pretaining to a mantle, especially to the mantle of mollusks; produced by the mantle; as, the pallial line, or impression, which marks the attachment of the mantle on the inner surface of a bivalve shell. See Illust. of Bivalve.

Palliament (n.) A dress; a robe.

Palliard (n.) A born beggar; a vagabond.

Palliard (n.) A lecher; a lewd person.

Palliasse (n.) See Paillasse.

Palliate (a.) Covered with a mant/e; cloaked; disguised.

Palliate (a.) Eased; mitigated; alleviated.

Palliated (imp. & p. p.) of Palliate

Palliating (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Palliate

Palliate (v. t.) To cover with a mantle or cloak; to cover up; to hide.

Palliate (v. t.) To cover with excuses; to conceal the enormity of, by excuses and apologies; to extenuate; as, to palliate faults.

Palliate (v. t.) To reduce in violence; to lessen or abate; to mitigate; to ease withhout curing; as, to palliate a disease.

Palliation (n.) The act of palliating, or state of being palliated; extenuation; excuse; as, the palliation of faults, offenses, vices.

Palliation (n.) Mitigation; alleviation, as of a disease.

Palliation (n.) That which cloaks or covers; disguise; also, the state of being covered or disguised.

Palliative (a.) Serving to palliate; serving to extenuate or mitigate.

Palliative (n.) That which palliates; a palliative agent.

Palliatory (a.) Palliative; extenuating.

Pallid (a.) Deficient in color; pale; wan; as, a pallid countenance; pallid blue.

Pallidity (n.) Pallidness; paleness.

Pallidly (adv.) In a pallid manner.

Pallidness (n.) The quality or state of being pallid; paleness; pallor; wanness.

Palliobranchiata (n. pl.) Same as Brachiopoda.

Palliobranchiate (a.) Having the pallium, or mantle, acting as a gill, as in brachiopods.

Pallia (pl. ) of Pallium

Palliums (pl. ) of Pallium

Pallium (n.) A large, square, woolen cloak which enveloped the whole person, worn by the Greeks and by certain Romans. It is the Roman name of a Greek garment.

Pallium (n.) A band of white wool, worn on the shoulders, with four purple crosses worked on it; a pall.

Pallium (n.) The mantle of a bivalve. See Mantle.

Pallium (n.) The mantle of a bird.

Pall-mall (n.) A game formerly common in England, in which a wooden ball was driven with a mallet through an elevated hoop or ring of iron. The name was also given to the mallet used, to the place where the game was played, and to the street, in London, still called Pall Mall.

Pallone (n.) An Italian game, played with a large leather ball.

Pallor (a.) Paleness; want of color; pallidity; as, pallor of the complexion.

Palm (n.) The inner and somewhat concave part of the hand between the bases of the fingers and the wrist.

Palm (n.) A lineal measure equal either to the breadth of the hand or to its length from the wrist to the ends of the fingers; a hand; -- used in measuring a horse's height.

Palm (n.) A metallic disk, attached to a strap, and worn the palm of the hand, -- used to push the needle through the canvas, in sewing sails, etc.

Palm (n.) The broad flattened part of an antler, as of a full-grown fallow deer; -- so called as resembling the palm of the hand with its protruding fingers.

Palm (n.) The flat inner face of an anchor fluke.

Palm (n.) Any endogenous tree of the order Palmae or Palmaceae; a palm tree.

Palm (n.) A branch or leaf of the palm, anciently borne or worn as a symbol of victory or rejoicing.

Palm (n.) Any symbol or token of superiority, success, or triumph; also, victory; triumph; supremacy.

Palmed (imp. & p. p.) of Palm

Palming (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Palm

Palm (v. t.) To handle.

Palm (v. t.) To manipulate with, or conceal in, the palm of the hand; to juggle.

Palm (v. t.) To impose by fraud, as by sleight of hand; to put by unfair means; -- usually with off.

Palmaceous (a.) Of or pertaining to palms; of the nature of, or resembling, palms.

Palma Christi () A plant (Ricinus communis) with ornamental peltate and palmately cleft foliage, growing as a woody perennial in the tropics, and cultivated as an herbaceous annual in temperate regions; -- called also castor-oil plant.

Palmacite (n.) A fossil palm.

Palmar (a.) Pertaining to, or corresponding with, the palm of the hand.

Palmar (a.) Of or pertaining to the under side of the wings of birds.

Palmaria (pl. ) of Palmarium

Palmarium (n.) One of the bifurcations of the brachial plates of a crinoid.

Palmary (a.) Palmar.

Palmary (a.) Worthy of the palm; palmy; preeminent; superior; principal; chief; as, palmary work.

Palmate (n.) A salt of palmic acid; a ricinoleate.

Palmate (a.) Alt. of Palmated

Palmated (a.) Having the shape of the hand; resembling a hand with the fingers spread.

Palmated (a.) Spreading from the apex of a petiole, as the divisions of a leaf, or leaflets, so as to resemble the hand with outspread fingers.

Palmated (a.) Having the anterior toes united by a web, as in most swimming birds; webbed.

Palmated (a.) Having the distal portion broad, flat, and more or less divided into lobes; -- said of certain corals, antlers, etc.

Palmately (adv.) In a palmate manner.

Palmatifid (a.) Palmate, with the divisions separated but little more than halfway to the common center.

Palmatilobed (a.) Palmate, with the divisions separated less than halfway to the common center.

Palmatisect (a.) Alt. of Palmatisected

Palmatisected (a.) Divided, as a palmate leaf, down to the midrib, so that the parenchyma is interrupted.

Palmcrist (n.) The palma Christi. (Jonah iv. 6, margin, and Douay version, note.)

Palmed (a.) Having or bearing a palm or palms.

Palmer (v. t.) One who palms or cheats, as at cards or dice.

Palmer (n.) A wandering religious votary; especially, one who bore a branch of palm as a token that he had visited the Holy Land and its sacred places.

Palmer (n.) A palmerworm.

Palmer (n.) Short for Palmer fly, an artificial fly made to imitate a hairy caterpillar; a hackle.

Palmerworm (n.) Any hairy caterpillar which appears in great numbers, devouring herbage, and wandering about like a palmer. The name is applied also to other voracious insects.

Palmerworm (n.) In America, the larva of any one of several moths, which destroys the foliage of fruit and forest trees, esp. the larva of Ypsolophus pometellus, which sometimes appears in vast numbers.

Palmette (n.) A floral ornament, common in Greek and other ancient architecture; -- often called the honeysuckle ornament.

Palmetto (n.) A name given to palms of several genera and species growing in the West Indies and the Southern United States. In the United States, the name is applied especially to the Chamaerops, / Sabal, Palmetto, the cabbage tree of Florida and the Carolinas. See Cabbage tree, under Cabbage.

Palmic (a.) Of, pertaining to, or derived from, the castor-oil plant (Ricinus communis, or Palma Christi); -- formerly used to designate an acid now called ricinoleic acid.

Palmidactyles (n. pl.) A group of wading birds having the toes webbed, as the avocet.

Palmiferous (a.) Bearing palms.

Palmigrade (a.) Putting the whole foot upon the ground in walking, as some mammals.

Palmin (n.) A white waxy or fatty substance obtained from castor oil.

Palmin (n.) Ricinolein.

Palmiped (a.) Web-footed, as a water fowl.

Palmiped (n.) A swimming bird; a bird having webbed feet.

Palmipedes (n. pl.) Same as Natatores.

Palmister (n.) One who practices palmistry

Palmistry (n.) The art or practice of divining or telling fortunes, or of judging of character, by the lines and marks in the palm of the hand; chiromancy.

Palmistry (n.) A dexterous use or trick of the hand.

Palmitate (n.) A salt of palmitic acid.

Palmite (n.) A South African plant (Prionium Palmita) of the Rush family, having long serrated leaves. The stems have been used for making brushes.

Palmitic (a.) Pertaining to, or obtained from, palmitin or palm oil; as, palmitic acid, a white crystalline body belonging to the fatty acid series. It is readily soluble in hot alcohol, and melts to a liquid oil at 62 C.

Palmitin (n.) A solid crystallizable fat, found abundantly in animals and in vegetables. It occurs mixed with stearin and olein in the fat of animal tissues, with olein and butyrin in butter, with olein in olive oil, etc. Chemically, it is a glyceride of palmitic acid, three molecules of palmitic acid being united to one molecule of glyceryl, and hence it is technically called tripalmitin, or glyceryl tripalmitate.

Palmitolic (a.) Pertaining to, or designating, an artificial acid of the oleic acid series, isomeric with linoleic acid.

Palmitone (n.) The ketone of palmitic acid.

Palm Sunday () The Sunday next before Easter; -- so called in commemoration of our Savior's triumphal entry into Jerusalem, when the multitude strewed palm branches in the way.

Palmy (a.) Bearing palms; abounding in palms; derived from palms; as, a palmy shore.

Palmy (a.) Worthy of the palm; flourishing; prosperous.

Palmyra (n.) A species of palm (Borassus flabelliformis) having a straight, black, upright trunk, with palmate leaves. It is found native along the entire northern shores of the Indian Ocean, from the mouth of the Tigris to New Guinea. More than eight hundred uses to which it is put are enumerated by native writers. Its wood is largely used for building purposes; its fruit and roots serve for food, its sap for making toddy, and its leaves for thatching huts.

Palola (n.) An annelid (Palola viridis) which, at certain seasons of the year, swarms at the surface of the sea about some of the Pacific Islands, where it is collected for food.

Pallometa (n.) A pompano.

Palp (n.) Same as Palpus.

Palp (v. t.) To have a distinct touch or feeling of; to feel.

Palpability (n.) The quality of being palpable, or perceptible by the touch.

Palpable (a.) Capable of being touched and felt; perceptible by the touch; as, a palpable form.

Palpable (a.) Easily perceptible; plain; distinct; obvious; readily perceived and detected; gross; as, palpable imposture; palpable absurdity; palpable errors.

Palpation (n.) Act of touching or feeling.

Palpation (n.) Examination of a patient by touch.

Palpator (n.) One of a family of clavicorn beetles, including those which have very long maxillary palpi.

Palpebrae (pl. ) of Palpebra

Palpebra (n.) The eyelid.

Palpebral (a.) Of or pertaining to the eyelids.

Palprbrate (a.) Having eyelids.

Palped (a.) Having a palpus.

Palpi (n.) pl. of Palpus. (Zool.) See Palpus.

Palpicorn (n.) One of a group of aquatic beetles (Palpicornia) having short club-shaped antennae, and long maxillary palpi.

Palpifer (n.) Same as Palpiger.

Palpiform (a.) Having the form of a palpus.

Palpiger (n.) That portion of the labium which bears the palpi in insects.

Palpigerous (a.) Bearing a palpus.

Palpitant (a.) Palpitating; throbbing; trembling.

Palpitated (imp. & p. p.) of Palpitate

Palpitating (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Palpitate

Palpitate (v. i.) To beat rapidly and more strongly than usual; to throb; to bound with emotion or exertion; to pulsate violently; to flutter; -- said specifically of the heart when its action is abnormal, as from excitement.

Palpitation (n.) A rapid pulsation; a throbbing; esp., an abnormal, rapid beating of the heart as when excited by violent exertion, strong emotion, or by disease.

Palpless (a.) Without a palpus.

Palpocil (n.) A minute soft filamentary process springing from the surface of certain hydroids and sponges.

Palpi (pl. ) of Palpus

Palpus (n.) A feeler; especially, one of the jointed sense organs attached to the mouth organs of insects, arachnids, crustaceans, and annelids; as, the mandibular palpi, maxillary palpi, and labial palpi. The palpi of male spiders serve as sexual organs. Called also palp. See Illust. of Arthrogastra and Orthoptera.

Palsgrave (n.) A count or earl who presided in the domestic court, and had the superintendence, of a royal household in Germany.

Palsgravine (n.) The consort or widow of a palsgrave.

Palsical (a.) Affected with palsy; palsied; paralytic.

Palsied (a.) Affected with palsy; paralyzed.

Palstave (n.) A peculiar bronze adz, used in prehistoric Europe about the middle of the bronze age.

Palster (n.) A pilgrim's staff.

Palsies (pl. ) of Palsy

Palsy (n.) Paralysis, complete or partial. See Paralysis.

Palsied (imp. & p. p.) of Palsy

Palsying (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Palsy

Palsy (v. t.) To affect with palsy, or as with palsy; to deprive of action or energy; to paralyze.

Palsywort (n.) The cowslip (Primula veris); -- so called from its supposed remedial powers.

Paltered (imp. & p. p.) of Palter

Paltering (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Palter

Palter (v. i.) To haggle.

Palter (v. i.) To act in insincere or deceitful manner; to play false; to equivocate; to shift; to dodge; to trifle.

Palter (v. i.) To babble; to chatter.

Palter (v. t.) To trifle with; to waste; to squander in paltry ways or on worthless things.

Palterer (n.) One who palters.

Palterly (a. & adv.) Paltry; shabby; shabbily; paltrily.

Paltock (n.) A kind of doublet; a jacket.

Paltrily (adv.) In a paltry manner.

Paltriness (n.) The state or quality of being paltry.

Paltry (superl.) Mean; vile; worthless; despicable; contemptible; pitiful; trifling; as, a paltry excuse; paltry gold.

Paludal (a.) Of or pertaining to marshes or fens; marshy.

Paludament (n.) See Paludamentum.

Paladumenta (pl. ) of Paludamentum

Paludamentum (n.) A military cloak worn by a general and his principal officers.

Paludicolae (n. pl.) A division of birds, including the cranes, rails, etc.

Paludicole (a.) Marsh-inhabiting; belonging to the Paludicolae

Paludinae (pl. ) of Paludina

Paludinas (pl. ) of Paludina

Paludina (n.) Any one of numerous species of freshwater pectinibranchiate mollusks, belonging to Paludina, Melantho, and allied genera. They have an operculated shell which is usually green, often with brown bands. See Illust. of Pond snail, under Pond.

Paludinal (a.) Inhabiting ponds or swamps.

Paludine (a.) Of or pertaining to a marsh.

Paludinous (a.) Paludinal. (b) Like or pertaining to the genus Paludina.

Paludinous (a.) Of or pertaining to a marsh or fen.

Paludism (n.) The morbid phenomena produced by dwelling among marshes; malarial disease or disposition.

Paludose (a.) Growing or living in marshy places; marshy.

Palule (n.) See Palulus or Palus.

Paluli (pl. ) of Palulus

Palulus (n.) Same as Palus.

Pali (pl. ) of Palus

Palus (n.) One of several upright slender calcareous processes which surround the central part of the calicle of certain corals.

Palustral (a.) Of or pertaining to a bog or marsh; boggy.

Palustrine (a.) Of, pertaining to, or living in, a marsh or swamp; marshy.

Paly (a.) Pale; wanting color; dim.

Paly (a.) Divided into four or more equal parts by perpendicular lines, and of two different tinctures disposed alternately.

Pam (n.) The knave of clubs.

Pament (n.) A pavement.

Pampano (n.) Same as Pompano.

Pampas (n. pl.) Vast plains in the central and southern part of the Argentine Republic in South America. The term is sometimes used in a wider sense for the plains extending from Bolivia to Southern Patagonia.

Pampered (imp. & p. p.) of Pamper

Pampering (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Pamper

Pamper (v. t.) To feed to the full; to feed luxuriously; to glut; as, to pamper the body or the appetite.

Pamper (v. t.) To gratify inordinately; to indulge to excess; as, to pamper pride; to pamper the imagination.

Pampered (a.) Fed luxuriously; indulged to the full; hence, luxuriant.

Pamperer (n.) One who, or that which, pampers.

Pamperize (v. t.) To pamper.

Pampero (n.) A violent wind from the west or southwest, which sweeps over the pampas of South America and the adjacent seas, often doing great damage.

Pamperos (n. pl.) A tribe of Indians inhabiting the pampas of South America.

Pamphlet (n.) A writing; a book.

Pamphlet (n.) A small book consisting of a few sheets of printed paper, stitched together, often with a paper cover, but not bound; a short essay or written discussion, usually on a subject of current interest.

Pamphlet (v. i.) To write a pamphlet or pamphlets.

Pamphleteer (n.) A writer of pamphlets; a scribbler.

Pamphleteer (v. i.) To write or publish pamphlets.

Pampiniform (a.) In the form of tendrils; -- applied especially to the spermatic and ovarian veins.

Pampre (n.) An ornament, composed of vine leaves and bunches of grapes, used for decorating spiral columns.

Pamprodactylous (a.) Having all the toes turned forward, as the colies.

Pan- () Alt. of Panto-

Panta- () Alt. of Panto-

Panto- () Combining forms signifying all, every; as, panorama, pantheism, pantagraph, pantograph. Pan- becomes pam- before b or p, as pamprodactylous.

Pan (n.) A part; a portion.

Pan (n.) The distance comprised between the angle of the epaule and the flanked angle.

Pan (n.) A leaf of gold or silver.

Pan (v. t. & i.) To join or fit together; to unite.

Pan (n.) The betel leaf; also, the masticatory made of the betel leaf, etc. See /etel.

Pan (n.) The god of shepherds, guardian of bees, and patron of fishing and hunting. He is usually represented as having the head and trunk of a man, with the legs, horns, and tail of a goat, and as playing on the shepherd's pipe, which he is said to have invented.

Pan (n.) A shallow, open dish or vessel, usually of metal, employed for many domestic uses, as for setting milk for cream, for frying or baking food, etc.; also employed for various uses in manufacturing.

Pan (n.) A closed vessel for boiling or evaporating. See Vacuum pan, under Vacuum.

Pan (n.) The part of a flintlock which holds the priming.

Pan (n.) The skull, considered as a vessel containing the brain; the upper part of the head; the brainpan; the cranium.

Pan (n.) A recess, or bed, for the leaf of a hinge.

Pan (n.) The hard stratum of earth that lies below the soil. See Hard pan, under Hard.

Pan (n.) A natural basin, containing salt or fresh water, or mud.

Panned (imp. & p. p.) of Pan

Panning (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Pan

Pan (v. t.) To separate, as gold, from dirt or sand, by washing in a kind of pan.

Pan (v. i.) To yield gold in, or as in, the process of panning; -- usually with out; as, the gravel panned out richly.

Pan (v. i.) To turn out (profitably or unprofitably); to result; to develop; as, the investigation, or the speculation, panned out poorly.

Panabase (n.) Same as Tetrahedrite.

Panacea (n.) A remedy for all diseases; a universal medicine; a cure-all; catholicon; hence, a relief or solace for affliction.

Panacea (n.) The herb allheal.

Panacean (a.) Having the properties of a panacea.

Panache (n.) A plume or bunch of feathers, esp. such a bunch worn on the helmet; any military plume, or ornamental group of feathers.

Panada (n.) Alt. of Panade

Panade (n.) Bread boiled in water to the consistence of pulp, and sweetened or flavored.

Panade (n.) A dagger.

Panama hat () A fine plaited hat, made in Central America of the young leaves of a plant (Carludovica palmata).

Pan-American (a.) Of or pertaining to both North and South America.

Pan-Anglican (a.) Belonging to, or representing, the whole Church of England; used less strictly, to include the Protestant Episcopal Church of the United States; as, the Pan-Anglican Conference at Lambeth, in 1888.

Panary (a.) Of or pertaining to bread or to breadmaking.

Panary (n.) A storehouse for bread.

Pancake (n.) A thin cake of batter fried in a pan or on a griddle; a griddlecake; a flapjack.

Pancarte (n.) A royal charter confirming to a subject all his possessions.

Pance (n.) The pansy.

Panch (n.) See Paunch.

Panchway (n.) A Bengalese four-oared boat for passengers.

Pancratian (a.) Pancratic; athletic.

Pancratiast (n.) One who engaged in the contests of the pancratium.

Pancratiastic (a.) Of or pertaining to the pancratium.

Pancratic (a.) Having all or many degrees of power; having a great range of power; -- said of an eyepiece made adjustable so as to give a varying magnifying power.

Pancratic (a.) Alt. of Pancratical

Pancratical (a.) Of or pertaining to the pancratium; athletic.

Pancratist (n.) An athlete; a gymnast.

Pancratium (n.) An athletic contest involving both boxing and wrestling.

Pancratium (n.) A genus of Old World amaryllideous bulbous plants, having a funnel-shaped perianth with six narrow spreading lobes. The American species are now placed in the related genus Hymenocallis.

Pancreas (n.) The sweetbread, a gland connected with the intestine of nearly all vertebrates. It is usually elongated and light-colored, and its secretion, called the pancreatic juice, is discharged, often together with the bile, into the upper part of the intestines, and is a powerful aid in digestion. See Illust. of Digestive apparatus.

Pancreatic (a.) Of or pertaining to the pancreas; as, the pancreatic secretion, digestion, ferments.

Pancreatin (n.) One of the digestive ferments of the pancreatic juice; also, a preparation containing such a ferment, made from the pancreas of animals, and used in medicine as an aid to digestion.

Pancy (n.) See Pansy.

Panda (n.) A small Asiatic mammal (Ailurus fulgens) having fine soft fur. It is related to the bears, and inhabits the mountains of Northern India.

Pandanus (n.) A genus of endogenous plants. See Screw pine.

Pandar (n.) Same as Pander.

Pandarism (n.) Same as Panderism.

Pandarize (v. i.) To pander.

Pandarous (a.) Panderous.

Pandean (a.) Of or relating to the god Pan.

Pandect (n.) A treatise which comprehends the whole of any science.

Pandect (n.) The digest, or abridgment, in fifty books, of the decisions, writings, and opinions of the old Roman jurists, made in the sixth century by direction of the emperor Justinian, and forming the leading compilation of the Roman civil law.

Pandemic (a.) Affecting a whole people or a number of countries; everywhere epidemic.

Pandemic (n.) A pandemic disease.

Pandemonium (n.) The great hall or council chamber of demons or evil spirits.

Pandemonium (n.) An utterly lawless, riotous place or assemblage.

Pander (n.) A male bawd; a pimp; a procurer.

Pander (n.) Hence, one who ministers to the evil designs and passions of another.

Pandered (imp. & p. p.) of Pander

Pandering (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Pander

Pander (v. t.) To play the pander for.

Pander (v. i.) To act the part of a pander.

Panderage (n.) The act of pandering.

Panderism (n.) The employment, arts, or practices of a pander.

Panderly (a.) Having the quality of a pander.

Pandermite (n.) A hydrous borate of lime, near priceite.

Panderous (a.) Of or relating to a pander; characterizing a pander.

Pandiculated (a.) Extended; spread out; stretched.

Pandiculation (n.) A stretching and stiffening of the trunk and extremities, as when fatigued and drowsy.

Pandit (n.) See Pundit.

Pandoor (n.) Same as Pandour.

Pandora (n.) A beautiful woman (all-gifted), whom Jupiter caused Vulcan to make out of clay in order to punish the human race, because Prometheus had stolen the fire from heaven. Jupiter gave Pandora a box containing all human ills, which, when the box was opened, escaped and spread over the earth. Hope alone remained in the box. Another version makes the box contain all the blessings of the gods, which were lost to men when Pandora opened it.

Pandora (n.) A genus of marine bivalves, in which one valve is flat, the other convex.

Pandore (n.) An ancient musical instrument, of the lute kind; a bandore.

Pandour (n.) One of a class of Hungarian mountaineers serving in the Austrian army; -- so called from Pandur, a principal town in the region from which they originally came.

Pandowdy (n.) A deep pie or pudding made of baked apples, or of sliced bread and apples baked together, with no bottom crust.

Pandurate (a.) Alt. of Panduriform

Panduriform (a.) Obovate, with a concavity in each side, like the body of a violin; fiddle-shaped; as, a panduriform leaf; panduriform color markings of an animal.

Pane (n.) The narrow edge of a hammer head. See Peen.

Pane (n.) A division; a distinct piece, limited part, or compartment of any surface; a patch; hence, a square of a checkered or plaided pattern.

Pane (n.) One of the openings in a slashed garment, showing the bright colored silk, or the like, within; hence, the piece of colored or other stuff so shown.

Pane (n.) A compartment of a surface, or a flat space; hence, one side or face of a building; as, an octagonal tower is said to have eight panes.

Pane (n.) Especially, in modern use, the glass in one compartment of a window sash.

Pane (n.) In irrigating, a subdivision of an irrigated surface between a feeder and an outlet drain.

Pane (n.) One of the flat surfaces, or facets, of any object having several sides.

Pane (n.) One of the eight facets surrounding the table of a brilliant cut diamond.

Paned (a.) Having panes; provided with panes; also, having openings; as, a paned window; paned window sash.

Paned (a.) Having flat sides or surfaces; as, a six/paned nut.

Panegyric (a.) An oration or eulogy in praise of some person or achievement; a formal or elaborate encomium; a laudatory discourse; laudation. See Synonym of Eulogy.

Panegyric (a.) Alt. of Panegyrical

Panegyrical (a.) Containing praise or eulogy; encomiastic; laudatory.

Panegyris (n.) A festival; a public assembly.

Panegyrist (n.) One who delivers a panegyric; a eulogist; one who extols or praises, either by writing or speaking.

Panegyrized (imp. & p. p.) of Panegyrize

Panegyrizing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Panegyrize

Panegyrize (v. t.) To praise highly; to extol in a public speech; to write or deliver a panegyric upon; to eulogize.

Panegyrize (v. i.) To indulge in panegyrics.

Panegyry (n.) A panegyric.

Panel (n.) A sunken compartment with raised margins, molded or otherwise, as in ceilings, wainscotings, etc.

Panel (n.) A piece of parchment or a schedule, containing the names of persons summoned as jurors by the sheriff; hence, more generally, the whole jury.

Panel (n.) A prisoner arraigned for trial at the bar of a criminal court.

Panel (n.) Formerly, a piece of cloth serving as a saddle; hence, a soft pad beneath a saddletree to prevent chafing.

Panel (n.) A board having its edges inserted in the groove of a surrounding frame; as, the panel of a door.

Panel (n.) One of the faces of a hewn stone.

Panel (n.) A slab or plank of wood upon which, instead of canvas, a picture is painted.

Panel (n.) A heap of dressed ore.

Panel (n.) One of the districts divided by pillars of extra size, into which a mine is laid off in one system of extracting coal.

Panel (n.) A plain strip or band, as of velvet or plush, placed at intervals lengthwise on the skirt of a dress, for ornament.

Panel (n.) A portion of a framed structure between adjacent posts or struts, as in a bridge truss.

Paneled (imp. & p. p.) of Panel

Panelled () of Panel

Paneling (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Panel

Panelling () of Panel

Panel (v. t.) To form in or with panels; as, to panel a wainscot.

Panelation (n.) The act of impaneling a jury.

Paneless (a.) Without panes.

Paneling (n.) A forming in panels; panelwork.

Panelwork (n.) Wainscoting.

Paneulogism (n.) Eulogy of everything; indiscriminate praise.

Panfuls (pl. ) of Panful

Panful (n.) Enough to fill a pan.

Pang (n.) A paroxysm of extreme pain or anguish; a sudden and transitory agony; a throe; as, the pangs of death.

Pang (v. t.) To torture; to cause to have great pain or suffering; to torment.

Pangenesis (n.) An hypothesis advanced by Darwin in explanation of heredity.

Pangenetic (a.) Of or pertaining to pangenesis.

Pangful (a.) Full of pangs.

Pangless (a.) Without a pang; painless.

Pangolin (n.) Any one of several species of Manis, Pholidotus, and related genera, found in Africa and Asia. They are covered with imbricated scales, and feed upon ants. Called also scaly ant-eater.

Pangothic (a.) Of, pertaining to, or including, all the Gothic races.

Panhellenic (a.) Of or pertaining to all Greece, or to Panhellenism; including all Greece, or all the Greeks.

Panhellenism (n.) A scheme to unite all the Greeks in one political body.

Panhellenist (n.) An advocate of Panhellenism.

Panhellenium (n.) An assembly or association of Greeks from all the states of Greece.

Panic (n.) A plant of the genus Panicum; panic grass; also, the edible grain of some species of panic grass.

Panic (a.) Extreme or sudden and causeless; unreasonable; -- said of fear or fright; as, panic fear, terror, alarm.

Panic (a.) A sudden, overpowering fright; esp., a sudden and groundless fright; terror inspired by a trifling cause or a misapprehension of danger; as, the troops were seized with a panic; they fled in a panic.

Panic (a.) By extension: A sudden widespread fright or apprehension concerning financial affairs.

Panical (a.) See Panic, a.

Panicle (n.) A pyramidal form of inflorescence, in which the cluster is loosely branched below and gradually simpler toward the end.

Panicled (a.) Furnished with panicles; arranged in, or like, panicles; paniculate.

Panic-stricken (a.) Alt. of Panic-struck

Panic-struck (a.) Struck with a panic, or sudden fear.

Paniculate (a.) Alt. of Paniculated

Paniculated (a.) Same as Panicled.

Panicum (n.) A genus of grasses, including several hundred species, some of which are valuable; panic grass.

Panidiomorphic (a.) Having a completely idiomorphic structure; -- said of certain rocks.

Panier (n.) See Pannier, 3.

Panification (n.) The act or process of making bread.

Panim (n.) See Painim.

Panislamism (n.) A desire or plan for the union of all Mohammedan nations for the conquest of the world.

Panivorous (a.) Eating bread; subsisting on bread.

Pannade (n.) The curvet of a horse.

Pannage (n.) The food of swine in the woods, as beechnuts, acorns, etc.; -- called also pawns.

Pannage (n.) A tax paid for the privilege of feeding swine in the woods.

Pannary (a.) See Panary.

Pannel (n.) A kind of rustic saddle.

Pannel (n.) The stomach of a hawk.

Pannel (n.) A carriage for conveying a mortar and its bed, on a march.

Pannier (n.) A bread basket; also, a wicker basket (used commonly in pairs) for carrying fruit or other things on a horse or an ass

Pannier (n.) A shield of basket work formerly used by archers as a shelter from the enemy's missiles.

Pannier (n.) A table waiter at the Inns of Court, London.

Pannier (n.) A framework of steel or whalebone, worn by women to expand their dresses; a kind of bustle.

Panniered (a.) Bearing panniers.

Pannikel (n.) The brainpan, or skull; hence, the crest.

Pannikin (n.) A small pan or cup.

Pannose (a.) Similar in texture or appearance to felt or woolen cloth.

Pannus (n.) A very vascular superficial opacity of the cornea, usually caused by granulation of the eyelids.

Panoistic (a.) Producing ova only; -- said of the ovaries of certain insects which do not produce vitelligenous cells.

Panomphean (a.) Uttering ominous or prophetic voices; divining.

Panoplied (a.) Dressed in panoply.

Panoply (n.) Defensive armor in general; a full suit of defensive armor.

Panopticon (n.) A prison so contructed that the inspector can see each of the prisoners at all times, without being seen.

Panopticon (n.) A room for the exhibition of novelties.

Panorama (n.) A complete view in every direction.

Panorama (n.) A picture presenting a view of objects in every direction, as from a central point.

Panorama (n.) A picture representing scenes too extended to be beheld at once, and so exhibited a part at a time, by being unrolled, and made to pass continuously before the spectator.

Panoramic (a.) Alt. of Panoramical

Panoramical (a.) Of, pertaining to, or like, a panorama.

Panorpian (a.) Like, or pertaining to, the genus Panorpa.

Panorpian (n.) Same as Panorpid.

Panorpid (n.) Any neuropterous insect of the genus Panorpa, and allied genera. The larvae feed on plant lice.

Panpharmacon (n.) A medicine for all diseases; a panacea.

Panpresbyterian (a.) Belonging to, or representative of, those who hold Presbyterian views in all parts of the world; as, a Panpresbyterian council.

Pansclavic () Alt. of Pansclavonian

Pansclavism () Alt. of Pansclavonian

Pansclavist () Alt. of Pansclavonian

Pansclavonian () See Panslavic, Panslavism, etc.

Panshon (n.) An earthen vessel wider at the top than at the bottom, -- used for holding milk and for various other purposes.

Pansied (a.) Covered or adorned with pansies.

Panslavic (a.) Pertaining to all the Slavic races.

Panslavism (n.) A scheme or desire to unite all the Slavic races into one confederacy.

Panslavist (n.) One who favors Panslavism.

Panslavonian (a.) See Panslavic.

Pansophical (a.) All-wise; claiming universal knowledge; as, pansophical pretenders.

Pansophy (n.) Universal wisdom; esp., a system of universal knowledge proposed by Comenius (1592 -- 1671), a Moravian educator.

Panspermatist (n.) Alt. of Panspermist

Panspermist (n.) A believer in panspermy; one who rejects the theory of spontaneous generation; a biogenist.

Panspermic (a.) Of or pertaining to panspermy; as, the panspermic hypothesis.

Panspermy (n.) The doctrine of the widespread distribution of germs, from which under favorable circumstances bacteria, vibrios, etc., may develop.

Panspermy (n.) The doctrine that all organisms must come from living parents; biogenesis; -- the opposite of spontaneous generation.

Panstereorama (n.) A model of a town or country, in relief, executed in wood, cork, pasteboard, or the like.

Pansies (pl. ) of Pansy

Pansy (n.) A plant of the genus Viola (V. tricolor) and its blossom, originally purple and yellow. Cultivated varieties have very large flowers of a great diversity of colors. Called also heart's-ease, love-in-idleness, and many other quaint names.

Panted (imp. & p. p.) of Pant

Panting (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Pant

Pant (v. i.) To breathe quickly or in a labored manner, as after exertion or from eagerness or excitement; to respire with heaving of the breast; to gasp.

Pant (v. i.) Hence: To long eagerly; to desire earnestly.

Pant (v. i.) To beat with unnatural violence or rapidity; to palpitate, or throb; -- said of the heart.

Pant (v. i.) To sigh; to flutter; to languish.

Pant (v. t.) To breathe forth quickly or in a labored manner; to gasp out.

Pant (v. t.) To long for; to be eager after.

Pant (n.) A quick breathing; a catching of the breath; a gasp.

Pant (n.) A violent palpitation of the heart.

Panta- () See Pan-.

Pantable (n.) See Pantofle.

Pantacosm (n.) See Cosmolabe.

Pantagraph (n.) See Pantograph.

Pantagruelism (n.) The theory or practice of the medical profession; -- used in burlesque or ridicule.

Pantagruelism (n.) An assumption of buffoonery to cover some serious purpose.

Pantalet (n.) One of the legs of the loose drawers worn by children and women; particularly, the lower part of such a garment, coming below the knee, often made in a separate piece; -- chiefly in the plural.

Pantaloon (n.) A ridiculous character, or an old dotard, in the Italian comedy; also, a buffoon in pantomimes.

Pantaloon (n.) A bifurcated garment for a man, covering the body from the waist downwards, and consisting of breeches and stockings in one.

Pantaloon (n.) In recent times, same as Trousers.

Pantaloonery (n.) The character or performances of a pantaloon; buffoonery.

Pantaloonery (n.) Materials for pantaloons.

Pantamorph (n.) That which assumes, or exists in, all forms.

Pantamorphic (a.) Taking all forms.

Pantascope (n.) A pantascopic camera.

Pantascopic (a.) Viewing all; taking a view of the whole. See under Camera.

Pantastomata (n. pl.) One of the divisions of Flagellata, including the monads and allied forms.

Pantechnicon (n.) A depository or place where all sorts of manufactured articles are collected for sale.

Pantelegraph (n.) See under Telegraph.

Panter (n.) One who pants.

Panter (n.) A keeper of the pantry; a pantler.

Panter (n.) A net; a noose.

Panteutonic (a.) Of or pertaining to all the Teutonic races.

Pantheism (n.) The doctrine that the universe, taken or conceived of as a whole, is God; the doctrine that there is no God but the combined force and laws which are manifested in the existing universe; cosmotheism.

Pantheist (n.) One who holds to pantheism.

Pantheistic (a.) Alt. of Pantheistical

Pantheistical (a.) Of or pertaining to pantheism; founded in, or leading to, pantheism.

Pantheologist (n.) One versed in pantheology.

Pantheology (n.) A system of theology embracing all religions; a complete system of theology.

Pantheon (n.) A temple dedicated to all the gods; especially, the building so called at Rome.

Pantheon (n.) The collective gods of a people, or a work treating of them; as, a divinity of the Greek pantheon.

Panther (n.) A large dark-colored variety of the leopard, by some zoologists considered a distinct species. It is marked with large ringlike spots, the centers of which are darker than the color of the body.

Panther (n.) In America, the name is applied to the puma, or cougar, and sometimes to the jaguar.

Pantheress (n.) A female panther.

Pantherine (a.) Like a panther, esp. in color; as, the pantherine snake (Ptyas mucosus) of Brazil.

Pantile (n.) A roofing tile, of peculiar form, having a transverse section resembling an elongated S laid on its side (/).

Pantingly (adv.) With palpitation or rapid breathing.

Pantisocracy (n.) A Utopian community, in which all should rule equally, such as was devised by Coleridge, Lovell, and Southey, in their younger days.

Pantisocrat (n.) A pantisocratist.

Pantisocratic (a.) Of or pertaining to a pantisocracy.

Pantisocratist (n.) One who favors or supports the theory of a pantisocracy.

Pantler (n.) The servant or officer, in a great family, who has charge of the bread and the pantry.

Panto- () See Pan-.

Pantochronometer (n.) An instrument combining a compass, sundial, and universal time dial.

Pantofle (n.) A slipper for the foot.

Pantograph (n.) An instrument for copying plans, maps, and other drawings, on the same, or on a reduced or an enlarged, scale.

Pantographic (a.) Alt. of Pantographical

Pantographical (a.) Of or pertaining to a pantograph; relating to pantography.

Pantography (n.) A general description; entire view of an object.

Pantological (a.) Of or pertaining to pantology.

Pantologist (n.) One versed in pantology; a writer of pantology.

Pantology (n.) A systematic view of all branches of human knowledge; a work of universal information.

Pantometer (n.) An instrument for measuring angles for determining elevations, distances, etc.

Pantometry (n.) Universal measurement.

Pantomime (n.) A universal mimic; an actor who assumes many parts; also, any actor.

Pantomime (n.) One who acts his part by gesticulation or dumb show only, without speaking; a pantomimist.

Pantomime (n.) A dramatic representation by actors who use only dumb show; hence, dumb show, generally.

Pantomime (n.) A dramatic and spectacular entertainment of which dumb acting as well as burlesque dialogue, music, and dancing by Clown, Harlequin, etc., are features.

Pantomime (a.) Representing only in mute actions; pantomimic; as, a pantomime dance.

Pantomimic (a.) Alt. of Pantomimical

Pantomimical (a.) Of or pertaining to the pantomime; representing by dumb show.

Pantomimist (n.) An actor in pantomime; also, a composer of pantomimes.

Panton (n.) A horseshoe to correct a narrow, hoofbound heel.

Pantophagist (n.) A person or an animal that has the habit of eating all kinds of food.

Pantophagous (a.) Eating all kinds of food.

Pantophagy (n.) The habit or power of eating all kinds of food.

Pantopoda (n. pl.) Same as Pycnogonida.

Pantoscopic (a.) Literally, seeing everything; -- a term applied to eyeglasses or spectacles divided into two segments, the upper being designed for distant vision, the lower for vision of near objects.

Pantries (pl. ) of Pantry

Pantry (n.) An apartment or closet in which bread and other provisions are kept.

Panurgic (a.) Skilled in all kinds of work.

Panurgy (n.) Skill in all kinds of work or business; craft.

Panyard (n.) See Pannier.

Panym (n. & a.) See Panim.

Panzoism (n.) A term used to denote all of the elements or factors which constitute vitality or vital energy.

Paolo (n.) An old Italian silver coin, worth about ten cents.

Pap (n.) A nipple; a mammilla; a teat.

Pap (n.) A rounded, nipplelike hill or peak; anything resembling a nipple in shape; a mamelon.

Pap (n.) A soft food for infants, made of bread boiled or softtened in milk or water.

Pap (n.) Nourishment or support from official patronage; as, treasury pap.

Pap (n.) The pulp of fruit.

Pap (v. t.) To feed with pap.

Papa (n.) A child's word for father.

Papa (n.) A parish priest in the Greek Church.

Papabote (n.) The upland plover.

Papacy (n.) The office and dignity of the pope, or pontiff, of Rome; papal jurisdiction.

Papacy (n.) The popes, collectively; the succession of popes.

Papacy (n.) The Roman Catholic religion; -- commonly used by the opponents of the Roman Catholics in disparagement or in an opprobrious sense.

Papagay (n.) See Popinjay, 1 (b).

Papain (n.) A proteolytic ferment, like trypsin, present in the juice of the green fruit of the papaw (Carica Papaya) of tropical America.

Papal (a.) Of or pertaining to the pope of Rome; proceeding from the pope; ordered or pronounced by the pope; as, papal jurisdiction; a papal edict; the papal benediction.

Papal (a.) Of or pertaining to the Roman Catholic Church.

Papalist (n.) A papist.

Papality (n.) The papacy.

Papalize (v. t.) To make papal.

Papalize (v. i.) To conform to popery.

Papally (adv.) In a papal manner; popishly

Papalty (n.) The papacy.

Papaphobia (n.) Intense fear or dread of the pope, or of the Roman Catholic Church.

Paparchy (n.) Government by a pope; papal rule.

Papaver (n.) A genus of plants, including the poppy.

Papaveraceous (a.) Of, pertaining to, or resembling, a natural order of plants (Papaveraceae) of which the poppy, the celandine, and the bloodroot are well-known examples.

Papaverine (n.) An alkaloid found in opium. It has a weaker therapeutic action than morphine.

Papaverous (a.) Of or pertaining to the poppy; of the nature of the poppy.

Papaw (n.) A tree (Carica Papaya) of tropical America, belonging to the order Passifloreae. It has a soft, spongy stem, eighteen or twenty feet high, crowned with a tuft of large, long-stalked, palmately lobed leaves. The milky juice of the plant is said to have the property of making meat tender. Also, its dull orange-colored, melon-shaped fruit, which is eaten both raw and cooked or pickled.

Papaw (n.) A tree of the genus Asimina (A. triloba), growing in the western and southern parts of the United States, and producing a sweet edible fruit; also, the fruit itself.

Papboat (n.) A kind of sauce boat or dish.

Papboat (n.) A large spiral East Indian marine shell (Turbinella rapha); -- so called because used by native priests to hold the oil for anointing.

Pape (n.) A spiritual father; specifically, the pope.

Papejay (n.) A popinjay.

Paper (n.) A substance in the form of thin sheets or leaves intended to be written or printed on, or to be used in wrapping. It is made of rags, straw, bark, wood, or other fibrous material, which is first reduced to pulp, then molded, pressed, and dried.

Paper (n.) A sheet, leaf, or piece of such substance.

Paper (n.) A printed or written instrument; a document, essay, or the like; a writing; as, a paper read before a scientific society.

Paper (n.) A printed sheet appearing periodically; a newspaper; a journal; as, a daily paper.

Paper (n.) Negotiable evidences of indebtedness; notes; bills of exchange, and the like; as, the bank holds a large amount of his paper.

Paper (n.) Decorated hangings or coverings for walls, made of paper. See Paper hangings, below.

Paper (n.) A paper containing (usually) a definite quantity; as, a paper of pins, tacks, opium, etc.

Paper (n.) A medicinal preparation spread upon paper, intended for external application; as, cantharides paper.

Paper (a.) Of or pertaining to paper; made of paper; resembling paper; existing only on paper; unsubstantial; as, a paper box; a paper army.

Papered (imp. & p. p.) of Paper

Papering (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Paper

Paper (v. t.) To cover with paper; to furnish with paper hangings; as, to paper a room or a house.

Paper (v. t.) To fold or inclose in paper.

Paper (v. t.) To put on paper; to make a memorandum of.

Paperweight (n.) See under Paper, n.

Papery (a.) Like paper; having the thinness or consistence of paper.

Papescent (a.) Containing or producing pap; like pap.

Papess (n.) A female pope; i. e., the fictitious pope Joan.

Papeterie (n.) A case or box containing paper and materials for writing.

Paphian (a.) Of or pertaining to Paphos, an ancient city of Cyprus, having a celebrated temple of Venus; hence, pertaining to Venus, or her rites.

Paphian (n.) A native or inhabitant of Paphos.

Papier-mache (n.) A hard and strong substance made of a pulp from paper, mixed with sise or glue, etc. It is formed into various articles, usually by means of molds.

Papilio (n.) A genus of butterflies.

Papilionaceous (a.) Resembling the butterfly.

Papilionaceous (a.) Having a winged corolla somewhat resembling a butterfly, as in the blossoms of the bean and pea.

Papilionaceous (a.) Belonging to that suborder of leguminous plants (Papilionaceae) which includes the bean, pea, vetch, clover, and locust.

Papiliones (n. pl.) The division of Lepidoptera which includes the butterflies.

Papilionides (n. pl.) The typical butterflies.

Papillae (pl. ) of Papilla

Papilla (n.) Any minute nipplelike projection; as, the papillae of the tongue.

Papillar (a.) Same as Papillose.

Papillary (a.) Of, pertaining to, or resembling, a papilla or papillae; bearing, or covered with, papillae; papillose.

Papillate (v. t. & i.) To cover with papillae; to take the form of a papilla, or of papillae.

Papillate (a.) Same as Papillose.

Papilliform (a.) Shaped like a papilla; mammilliform.

Papillomata (pl. ) of Papilloma

Papilloma (n.) A tumor formed by hypertrophy of the papillae of the skin or mucous membrane, as a corn or a wart.

Papillomatous (a.) Of, pertaining to, or consisting of, papillomata.

Papillose (a.) Covered with, or bearing, papillae; resembling papillae; papillate; papillar; papillary.

Papillote (n.) a small piece of paper on which women roll up their hair to make it curl; a curl paper.

Papillous (a.) Papillary; papillose.

Papillulate (a.) Having a minute papilla in the center of a larger elevation or depression.

Papion (n.) A West African baboon (Cynocephalus sphinx), allied to the chacma. Its color is generally chestnut, varying in tint.

Papism (n.) Popery; -- an offensive term.

Papist (n.) A Roman catholic; one who adheres to the Church of Rome and the authority of the pope; -- an offensive designation applied to Roman Catholics by their opponents.

Papistic (a.) Alt. of Papistical

Papistical (a.) Of or pertaining to the Church of Rome and its doctrines and ceremonies; pertaining to popery; popish; -- used disparagingly.

Papistry (n.) The doctrine and ceremonies of the Church of Rome; popery.

Papized (a.) Conformed to popery.

Papoose (n.) A babe or young child of Indian parentage in North America.

Pappiform (a.) Resembling the pappus of composite plants.

Pappoose (n.) Same as Papoose.

Pappose (a.) Furnished with a pappus; downy.

Pappous (a.) Pappose.

Pappus (n.) The hairy or feathery appendage of the achenes of thistles, dandelions, and most other plants of the order Compositae; also, the scales, awns, or bristles which represent the calyx in other plants of the same order.

Pappy (a.) Like pap; soft; succulent; tender.

Papuan (a.) Of or pertaining to Papua.

Papuars (n. pl.) The native black race of Papua or New Guinea, and the adjacent islands.

Papulae (pl. ) of Papula

Papula (n.) A pimple; a small, usually conical, elevation of the cuticle, produced by congestion, accumulated secretion, or hypertrophy of tissue; a papule.

Papula (n.) One of the numerous small hollow processes of the integument between the plates of starfishes.

Papular (a.) Covered with papules.

Papular (a.) Consisting of papules; characterized by the presence of papules; as, a papular eruption.

Papules (pl. ) of Papule

Papule (n.) Same as Papula.

Papulose (a.) Having papulae; papillose; as, a papulose leaf.

Papulous (a.) Covered with, or characterized by, papulae; papulose.

Papyraceous (a.) Made of papyrus; of the consistency of paper; papery.

Papyrean (a.) Of or pertaining to papyrus, or to paper; papyraceous.

Papyrine (n.) Imitation parchment, made by soaking unsized paper in dilute sulphuric acid.

Papyrograph (n.) An apparatus for multiplying writings, drawings, etc., in which a paper stencil, formed by writing or drawing with corrosive ink, is used. The word is also used of other means of multiplying copies of writings, drawings, etc. See Copygraph, Hectograph, Manifold.

Papyrography (n.) The process of multiplying copies of writings, etc., by means of the papyrograph.

Papyri (pl. ) of Papyrus

Papyrus (n.) A tall rushlike plant (Cyperus Papyrus) of the Sedge family, formerly growing in Egypt, and now found in Abyssinia, Syria, Sicily, etc. The stem is triangular and about an inch thick.

Papyrus (n.) The material upon which the ancient Egyptians wrote. It was formed by cutting the stem of the plant into thin longitudinal slices, which were gummed together and pressed.

Papyrus (n.) A manuscript written on papyrus; esp., pl., written scrolls made of papyrus; as, the papyri of Egypt or Herculaneum.

Paque (n.) See Pasch and Easter.

Par (n.) See Parr.

Par (prep.) By; with; -- used frequently in Early English in phrases taken from the French, being sometimes written as a part of the word which it governs; as, par amour, or paramour; par cas, or parcase; par fay, or parfay.

Par (n.) Equal value; equality of nominal and actual value; the value expressed on the face or in the words of a certificate of value, as a bond or other commercial paper.

Par (n.) Equality of condition or circumstances.

Para- () A prefix signifying alongside of, beside, beyond, against, amiss; as parable, literally, a placing beside; paradox, that which is contrary to opinion; parachronism.

Para- () A prefix denoting: (a) Likeness, similarity, or connection, or that the substance resembles, but is distinct from, that to the name of which it is prefixed; as paraldehyde, paraconine, etc.; also, an isomeric modification. (b) Specifically: (Organ. Chem.) That two groups or radicals substituted in the benzene nucleus are opposite, or in the respective positions 1 and 4; 2 and 5; or 3 and 6, as paraxylene; paroxybenzoic acid. Cf. Ortho-, and Meta-. Also used adjectively.

Para (n.) A piece of Turkish money, usually copper, the fortieth part of a piaster, or about one ninth of a cent.

Parabanic (a.) Pertaining to, or designating, a nitrogenous acid which is obtained by the oxidation of uric acid, as a white crystalline substance (C3N2H2O3); -- also called oxalyl urea.

Parablast (n.) A portion of the mesoblast (of peripheral origin) of the developing embryo, the cells of which are especially concerned in forming the first blood and blood vessels.

Parablastic (a.) Of or pertaining to the parablast; as, the parablastic cells.

Parable (a.) Procurable.

Parable (n.) A comparison; a similitude; specifically, a short fictitious narrative of something which might really occur in life or nature, by means of which a moral is drawn; as, the parables of Christ.

Parable (v. t.) To represent by parable.

Parabolas (pl. ) of Parabola

Parabola (n.) A kind of curve; one of the conic sections formed by the intersection of the surface of a cone with a plane parallel to one of its sides. It is a curve, any point of which is equally distant from a fixed point, called the focus, and a fixed straight line, called the directrix. See Focus.

Parabola (n.) One of a group of curves defined by the equation y = axn where n is a positive whole number or a positive fraction. For the cubical parabola n = 3; for the semicubical parabola n = /. See under Cubical, and Semicubical. The parabolas have infinite branches, but no rectilineal asymptotes.

Parabole (n.) Similitude; comparison.

Parabolic (a.) Alt. of Parabolical

Parabolical (a.) Of the nature of a parable; expressed by a parable or figure; allegorical; as, parabolical instruction.

Parabolical (a.) Having the form or nature of a parabola; pertaining to, or resembling, a parabola; as, a parabolic curve.

Parabolical (a.) Generated by the revolution of a parabola, or by a line that moves on a parabola as a directing curve; as, a parabolic conoid.

Parabolically (adv.) By way of parable; in a parabolic manner.

Parabolically (adv.) In the form of a parabola.

Paraboliform (a.) Resembling a parabola in form.

Parabolism (n.) The division of the terms of an equation by a known quantity that is involved in the first term.

Parabolist (n.) A narrator of parables.

Paraboloid (n.) The solid generated by the rotation of a parabola about its axis; any surface of the second order whose sections by planes parallel to a given line are parabolas.

Paraboloidal (a.) Of, pertaining to, or resembling, a paraboloid.

Parabronchia (pl. ) of Parabronchium

Parabronchium (n.) One of the branches of an ectobronchium or entobronchium.

Paracelsian (a.) Of, pertaining to, or in conformity with, the practice of Paracelsus, a Swiss physician of the 15th century.

Paracelsian (n.) A follower of Paracelsus or his practice or teachings.

Paracelsist (n.) A Paracelsian.

Paracentesis (n.) The perforation of a cavity of the body with a trocar, aspirator, or other suitable instrument, for the evacuation of effused fluid, pus, or gas; tapping.

Paracentric (a.) Alt. of Paracentrical

Paracentrical (a.) Deviating from circularity; changing the distance from a center.

Parachordal (a.) Situated on either side of the notochord; -- applied especially to the cartilaginous rudiments of the skull on each side of the anterior part of the notochord.

Parachordal (n.) A parachordal cartilage.

Parachronism (n.) An error in chronology, by which the date of an event is set later than the time of its occurrence.

Parachrose (a.) Changing color by exposure

Parachute (n.) A contrivance somewhat in the form of an umbrella, by means of which a descent may be made from a balloon, or any eminence.

Parachute (n.) A web or fold of skin which extends between the legs of certain mammals, as the flying squirrels, colugo, and phalangister.

Paraclete (n.) An advocate; one called to aid or support; hence, the Consoler, Comforter, or Intercessor; -- a term applied to the Holy Spirit.

Paraclose (n.) See Parclose.

Paracmastic (a.) Gradually decreasing; past the acme, or crisis, as a distemper.

Paraconic (a.) Pertaining to, or designating, an organic acid obtained as a deliquescent white crystalline substance, and isomeric with itaconic, citraconic, and mesaconic acids.

Paraconine (n.) A base resembling and isomeric with conine, and obtained as a colorless liquid from butyric aldehyde and ammonia.

Paracorolla (n.) A secondary or inner corolla; a corona, as of the Narcissus.

Paracrostic (n.) A poetical composition, in which the first verse contains, in order, the first letters of all the verses of the poem.

Paracyanogen (n.) A polymeric modification of cyanogen, obtained as a brown or black amorphous residue by heating mercuric cyanide.

Paracymene (n.) Same as Cymene.

Paradactyla (pl. ) of Paradactylum

Paradactylum (n.) The side of a toe or finger.

Parade (v. t.) The ground where a military display is held, or where troops are drilled.

Parade (v. t.) An assembly and orderly arrangement or display of troops, in full equipments, for inspection or evolutions before some superior officer; a review of troops. Parades are general, regimental, or private (troop, battery, or company), according to the force assembled.

Parade (v. t.) Pompous show; formal display or exhibition.

Parade (v. t.) That which is displayed; a show; a spectacle; an imposing procession; the movement of any body marshaled in military order; as, a parade of firemen.

Parade (v. t.) Posture of defense; guard.

Parade (v. t.) A public walk; a promenade.

Paraded (imp. & p. p.) of Parade

Parading (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Parade

Parade (v. t.) To exhibit in a showy or ostentatious manner; to show off.

Parade (v. t.) To assemble and form; to marshal; to cause to maneuver or march ceremoniously; as, to parade troops.

Parade (v. i.) To make an exhibition or spectacle of one's self, as by walking in a public place.

Parade (v. i.) To assemble in military order for evolutions and inspection; to form or march, as in review.

Paradigm (n.) An example; a model; a pattern.

Paradigm (n.) An example of a conjugation or declension, showing a word in all its different forms of inflection.

Paradigm (n.) An illustration, as by a parable or fable.

Paradigmatic (a.) Alt. of Paradigmatical

Paradigmatical (a.) Exemplary.

Paradigmatic (n.) A writer of memoirs of religious persons, as examples of Christian excellence.

Paradigmatized (imp. & p. p.) of Paradigmatize

Paradigmatizing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Paradigmatize

Paradigmatize (v. t.) To set forth as a model or example.

Paradisaic (a.) Alt. of Paradisaical

Paradisaical (a.) Of or pertaining to, or resembling, paradise; paradisiacal.

Paradisal (a.) Paradisiacal.

Paradise (n.) The garden of Eden, in which Adam and Eve were placed after their creation.

Paradise (n.) The abode of sanctified souls after death.

Paradise (n.) A place of bliss; a region of supreme felicity or delight; hence, a state of happiness.

Paradise (n.) An open space within a monastery or adjoining a church, as the space within a cloister, the open court before a basilica, etc.

Paradise (n.) A churchyard or cemetery.

Paradise (v. t.) To affect or exalt with visions of felicity; to entrance; to bewitch.

Paradisean (a.) Paradisiacal.

Paradised (a.) Placed in paradise; enjoying delights as of paradise.

Paradisiac (a.) Alt. of Paradisiacal

Paradisiacal (a.) Of or pertaining to paradise; suitable to, or like, paradise.

Paradisial (a.) Alt. of Paradisian

Paradisian (a.) Paradisiacal.

Paradisic (a.) Paradisiacal.

Paradisical (a.) Paradisiacal.

Paradoses (pl. ) of Parados

Parados (n.) An intercepting mound, erected in any part of a fortification to protect the defenders from a rear or ricochet fire; a traverse.

Paradoxes (pl. ) of Paradox

Paradox (n.) A tenet or proposition contrary to received opinion; an assertion or sentiment seemingly contradictory, or opposed to common sense; that which in appearance or terms is absurd, but yet may be true in fact.